


The gate that connected the space to the hideout of Oscar Orcus opened, from there Shia jumped in *pyon* like a rabbit.



She went to meet with the master of Raisen Great Labyrinth that they had once conquered, Miledi Raisen, as the messenger of Hajime, but now she had accomplished her mission safely and came back.



Shia saw the artificial arm that had been properly returned to the left sleeve of Hajime who welcomed her, her expression then became even happier.



"Welcome back, Shia. I got your report. Looks like you were able to meet with Miledi again smoothly, huh?"



"Yes desu. Unfortunately, it seems that Miledi-san cannot easily leave that territory. She will be saving strength until the day of the decisive battle and I couldn't directly bring her back but… in exchange I received several things that seemed useful from her."



"I see. You did well. Thanks for your hard work. So, you could enter using the proof of conquer?"



Toward Shia who was clapping on the luggage bag that she was carrying on her back with a smile that seemed to say "I have good things here!", Hajime returned a smile while asking.



Once they received treatment like filth that was ejected by toilet, Hajime recalled the time when they were made to take the shortcut to outside the labyrinth. He tilted his head in contemplation thinking 'don't tell me she is going through that water channel in reverse?'. If Shia actually did that, then it was like she was going out from the inside of a toilet while saying "Good afternoon!". So thinking about her maiden heart, he would have to reward her with his all.



It seemed that Shia too guessed what Hajime was imagining from his question. She smiled wryly while shaking her head saying that she was fine.



"The spring at the outskirts of Brook didn't react just as half-expected. And so, I attempted to breakthrough from the regular entrance, but at that time the proof of conquer reacted… the usual transfer method at the first room sent me to the deepest room. It did it politely, while roughly rotating the room. Well, it didn't affect the current me, so there was no problem but… as always she was an irritating person. Yes, truly."



"I, I see… no, really thanks for your hard work. Anyway, get inside. Inside, the time is also stretched out so I'll listen to the detail in the workshop."



"Ah, yes desu."



Shia recollected with her gaze turning into the direction of the beyond while a somewhat black thing covered her, to that Hajime somehow could imagine what kind of exchange she had with Miledi, Hajime whose wry smile deepened invited Shia into the workshop.



At that time, the moment Shia entered the building from outside where the gate was installed into the building, *gashon! gashon!* mechanical footsteps were resounding nearby. At the same time, a happy voice of a child reverberated.



"Ah, Shia-oneechan! Welcome home nano!"



"Myuu-chan! I'm home… desu?"



While Shia's cheeks were loosening from Myuu's welcoming words, she also tilted her head wondering "What's this voice I wonder?" and her face peeked out from behind Hajime. And then, the figure of Myuu being surrounded by golems in the shapes that she had never seen and Myuu herself sitting on one of the golems shoulder entered her eye so that Shia's words reflexively halted.



The number of golems were six. Their figures had multiple legs and multiple arms holding countless armaments with metallic shine from their bodies, every one of the golem had grim intensity. If for example, Shia encountered them inside labyrinth or somewhere else, then she would surely say things like "Enemy discovered certain death attack desuu!" or "Victory goes to the one who makes the first moves desuu!" and attacked them.



Actually, until Shia came back several days had passed inside the workshop, during that time Hajime saw various points where he could improve 'Belfegor' and 'Asmodeusu' that he presented to Remia and Myuu, so Hajime applied sequential improvement on them. As a result, he accomplished the conclusion where in the end the golems could even endure combat, so Hajime undertook the production of the living golem itself in order to invest them into the battle force as weapons.



About that time he was also producing the large size weapons so they were becoming short of hands with just 'Belfegor' and 'Asmodeusu', and so while producing the combat golems Hajime also increased the number of Myuu's pets while he was at it.



But, it wasn't like there wasn't any problem at all…



"Err, Myuu-chan, those things that look like golem are…"



"Myuu got them from papa nano! This child is 'Bel-chan', this one is 'Sa-chan'. After that there are 'Lu-chan' and 'Ma-chan' and 'Levi-chan' and 'Bal-chan' nano!"



"Ha, haa, is that so. Uh huh, anyway, they are Hajime-san's work so it's ok desu. Isn't it great, Myuu-chan."



"Yes nano!"



By the way, the golems' formal names in order were 'Satan', 'Lusifer', 'Mamon', 'Leviatan', and 'Baalsebuf' it seemed. All of those names were given by Myuu promptly without any pondering. It went without saying how Hajime's cheeks were cramping from that. Later there would be a need to seriously investigate whether Myuu had attracted the eyes of strange things.



At the same time with Myuu's introduction of their names, the living golems each took cool poses. Hajime didn't give them that function, also Myuu didn't seem to give them the instruction but… just why in the world they took that pose…



Their figures felt just like they were saying "Deadly☆Sins☆Battle☆Squad☆Demon Rangeeeer!!!" The red ranger was surely the 'Satan' of fury as expected.



Anyway, there was no malfunction that came out, and they were also really obedient toward Myuu that made anyone watching imagine the golems waving their dog tail left and right happily so Hajime chose to ignore it. Without stopping any longer, he led Shia into the workshop.



Entering the workshop, the hour crystal was activated and the flow of time there was a tenth of normal. Looking at the slightly dull colored space and weapons that were automatically produced due to the 'Automatic Transmutation', Shia leaked out a voice of admiration.



Hajime made such a Shia sit on the chair at the corner of the room and listened to her report. Shia fixed her sitting posture and took out several things that seemed to be artifacts from her luggage bag.



"Hajime-san, these are things that Miledi-san handed to me."



"… From what I see they look like artifacts."



"Yes. It seems that they aren't perfect, but they are countermeasures against Divine Statement. If Hajime-san revise it, perhaps it can also be completed."



"Hee… this thing is appreciated."



Hajime took the gray ball with the size around a marble and stared at it.



According to his magic eye stone and mineral appraisal, it seemed that the ball was filled with soul magic. Inside the ball it seemed it was enchanted with a magic of 'heart guidance' that possessed the effect to convey one's will directly to the state of the soul, or possibly to the soul itself.



"I had a prediction on the trick of Divine Statement, and it seemed I was right on the spot."



"And, that means?"



"That magic is a magic that is connected with soul magic. It reverberates the words directly in your soul and binds your consciousness at a subconscious level. It's something like an absurdly powerful suggestion, I guess. The magic needs the caster to murmur their name because of the common sense that a command needs a person to hand it down."



"I see. After all, there is no person that will obey a command with an unknown creator, is there? The statement becomes even more powerful when they say their complete nam. Also, because the listener's recognition of the speaker become even stronger, is it something like that?"



"You think so too, right? This marble ball… does it have a name?"



"Aa, no, I didn't ask. Isn't it fine to name it whatever?"



"Is that so. Then, I'll name it temporarily as 'Soul Wall', this thing seems to have the power to block the Divine Statement from reaching the soul. It applies 'heart guidance' to disturb the conveyed will and turn the statement into just noise. It isn't perfect. I guess because Ehito's Divine Statement is so powerful that it cannot be turned into noise."



Shia nodded "I see" toward Hajime's explanation.



"Then… if it's Hajime-san then you will be able to improve it so it can block perfectly?"



"Let's see… I think it's possible if I combine my magic power with sublimation magic. Though in the end, if it gets stolen like before and crushed then that's game over."



"Aa, now that you mentioned it… then, what to do? At this rate, it won't be usable except for a surprise attack, will it…"



"No, actually right now I have a bit of an idea. I don't have the attitude so there is hardship, but it looks like with a little bit more it will take shape. If I applied that then this won't get stolen. Moreover, I can surely create a 'Soul Wall' with high effect. In any case, it's a big help that I don't need to think about the countermeasure for Divine Statement from zero. This is your achievement, Shia."



Hajime joyful smile made Shia also flap her rabbit ears happily. The achievement actually belonged to Miledi who handed over the 'Soul Wall', but it was somewhat annoying to feel grateful to that person so Hajime praised Shia instead. Shia also had the same feeling somewhat so she honestly felt happy to be useful.



"Also, this too desu."



"Short sword huh? … Even so I feel very much power from it. Just what in the world… hee"



What was taken out from the luggage next was a short sword wrapped in cloth with its blade length reaching about twenty centimeter. It was a simple two bladed sword without a handle guard, it resembled the type of short sword that was called a dirk.



Hajime who received it took off the cloth, that moment he gazed in wonderment at the power that he felt, next he investigated it the same like with the 'Soul Wall'. His voice unintentionally leaked out at the ability that was enchanted in the sword. Looking at that state of Hajime, Shia also nodded in sympathy.



"According to Miledi-san, it's called 'Short Sword of Divine Crossing'. The concept filled into it is――'God killing', it seems."



"So, this is one of the three concept magic that Haltina said the liberators created, huh. So that Miledi had this. Chih, she should have given this thing right away."



"… When I said that, 'Didn't you say that killing god or anything is troublesome, ehhh? There is no way I can give this to that kind of person, right? Is your head okay? Heey? Is your head okay? Heey heey' she said that to me…"



"I see…"



"Yes. But it's fine desu. Because in retaliation, I smashed the place where Hajime-san's explosive destroyed that she grumbled saying it was hard work repairing it. I blew it into pieces. She was half-crying while saying sorry to me you know, ku-ku-ku"



"I, I see…"



Shia was black. It was the descent of black Shia. When Hajime was plainly sweating coldly, Shia stopped making crooked face and smiled widely while continuing her story. It was a splendid change.



"By the way, it seemed that there was also an artifact named 'World Crossing Arrow' to open the path to the Holy Precincts, but it was completely lost at the previous lost battle of the liberators. Besides, they were cornered by the masses before confronting Ehito, so it's unclear how much effect the 'god killing' will have. It's just, that short sword won't injure Yue-san's soul, so it can be used well desu."



"That's a nice one. For the moment, there is also the trump card that I prepared, but there is nothing better than having a lot of cards. And if this won't affect Yue then I got no complain at all."



"Isn't that right. I was told, that the 'god killing' concept, it seemed the liberators lost their temper because they couldn't really create the trump card, so all of them drunk a lot in desperation. In the end when they were all stone drunk they opened a tournament to swear at Ehito with foul language and that concept got created. Things like official stance or reasoning or mission, those kind of idle thoughts weren't included at all in the concept, only the feeling of 'die Ehito you shitty bastard' makes up the concept, so it won't affect anything else other than Ehito desu."



"I, I see… yeah, well, I understand their feelings. Miledi is an endlessly annoying woman, but when we take back Yue guess we need to at least say thanks huh."



While feeling sympathy and exasperation at the good relation? of the liberators, Hajime made a smile at how they had obtained two kind of useful artifacts.



When he listened further to Shia's report, it seemed that Miledi would mobilize the golems inside the labyrinth. So Shia installed a gate hole there. It appeared those golems were also constructed from metamorphosis magic, so it wasn't like Miledi was moving them all by herself, the golems were living things that moved independently obeying commands to a certain degree.



Thinking about it now, indeed it was hard to imagine that Miledi alone controlled fifty golem knights at the same time.



However, regarding the Holy Precincts or whether there were any more retainer gods other than Aruvheit, the weak point of the apostle or effective methods to fight them, etc., it seemed that Miledi didn't know about those more than what Hajime and the rest knew. Rather, thinking about how they had already directly faced Ehito and tasted his strength right with their body, in a sense Hajime and the rest were the ones who knew more about that.



Although, even without obtaining any new information but after receiving these things, Hajime had no complaints at all. Though, if he actually met Miledi directly face to face, surely he would want to smash her face.



When Shia finished her report in general, Hajime took out from his 'Treasure Warehouse II' another 'Treasure Warehouse II' exclusive for Shia and the improved Doryukken――the 'Vire Doryukken'm and other various equipments he prepared which he handed to her.



"Hauuuu, this is it desuu, as expected, it's no good without this hard-cold texture desuu"



The moment she received her partner the war hammer from Hajime, Shia rubbed her cheek on the mechanical part with bright smile. She was whispering scary things like "Splattering the enemy with this is unbearable desuu".



While somewhat drawing away, Hajime explained about the new functionality of all the new artifacts, but then suddenly the door of the workshop opened. The one who entered was, Kaori… and then, Suzu and Ryuutaro.



Actually, a little bit before Shia got in touch, the two of them finished contacting Fair Bergen and Haulia and allocated the gate key in those places and then they went to Orcus. And then, while Kaori was gathering material she also became their guard on the side. The two subdued the monsters in the abyss and endeavored to pile up battle experience and mastering the metamorphosis magic.



"Ah, Shia! Welcome back. Fufu, looking at you, it seems there are various results from you, right?"



"Kaori-san. I'm back desu! Also the two of you came earlier, wasn't it? How is Tou-sama――the people of Haulia clan and Fair Bergen?"



"Yep, Shiashia. There is no problem. The people of Fair Bergen don't have faith from the beginning. When they understood that it concerned the fate of the world, they acted quickly."



"Yep. Though they looked uneasy about the fighting, when we said that Nagumo's artifacts would be shared in full, they got motivated, yeah. As for Haulia-clan… aa, hm, well, ain't no problem, yeah?"



"… Why, it sounds like question?"



Shia directed a suspicious gaze at Ryuutaro. Ryuutaro showed a faltering state "Uu" at that gaze and his gaze wandered, then looking like he didn't really want to remember it he opened his mouth.



"No, there is really no problem at all. Just… that… they suddenly began to cry loudly it made me spooked…"



"Come again? Crying loudly? Tou-sama, was crying?"



"Yep, Shiashia. Karm-san was also included, the whole Haulia-clan were crying you know. After that it was a storm where they all talked simultaneously. They kept screaming things like "Boss banzai!" or "Finally, we can fight at his side!" or "Kill! Kill! Kill!". The mist in the forest got blown away a little bit just from their voices. It was plain scary."



"…"



"I think Sergeant Ha-tman style of training is just bad news yeah. Somehow, all of them had bloodshot eyes. Their killing intent was just amazing. An animal that looked like monkey in the trees dropped down plop… when I looked at its eyes, they were all white and it was dead already. Guess its heart stopped just from the killing intent."



"… Somehow I'm sorry."



Suzu and Ryuutaro explained while their faces were pale and they began to shiver. It must be a really abnormally terrifying scene. To put it bluntly, it was inevitable for the two to see the Haulia clan's respect and affection to Hajime as something the same like the fanatic's faith to Ehito. Inside their heart, they secretly thought "As expected, Nagumo-kun is demon king… no, maybe he is a demon god?"



On top of being able to participate at Hajime's battlefield, that request to join came from their respected boss. For them who wished to fight together with Hajime, the words "Lend me your strength" from that boss was unmistakably something really joyous. The scene where all of them went 'hya-ha' floated in Shia's eyes, her rabbit ears folded down with a plop and she also murmured words of apology.



Hajime who was smiling wryly at that exchange between Shia and the others moved the talk to Suzu and Ryuutaro in his wish to somehow avert from that topic.



"And then? What about your training result? Were you able to subdue good monster?"



"Uu-"



"Nope, not at all!"



Suzu who averted her gaze with awkward expressions and Ryuutaro who denied with lively laugh. For the time being, Hajime pulled the trigger of the new Donner and a rubber bullet shot Ryuutaro's temple. "NUOoOOO!" Ryuutaro yelled while writhing on the floor, to him Hajime's cold gaze was stabbing.



There Kaori put a stop to it in panic.



"Wa, wait, wait! It doesn't mean that there is no result!"



"Hoo. Then? What is this result you speak?"



Suzu whose expression was trembling from fear due to Hajime's lack of hesitation was twitching while answering.



"Ye, yep. As far as it goes, there was also Kaori's help and I managed to subdue quite many but…"



"What, so you actually manage to do it properly. Then what's the problem?"



"Err. First of all, I got a monster that can spit powerful acid, a large――centipede."



"Aah, that one. At the upper stratum, there is also monster that is similar with that, but this one at the lower stratum can separate its segment to leap, it's ability to scatter acid while separating its segment is unusual huh. I remember that one made me get a little cold feet you know."



"After that, a monster that can fire exploding needles rapidly like bullet, a large――bee."



"That one huh. Rather than calling it needle, it's more a small missile isn't it. I remember when I intercepted the needle I got swallowed in explosion, that was shocking."



"A monster that swim underground like a mole――ant."



"Well, it has surprise attacks going for it."



"Having six arms that fires off wind sickles――praying mantis."



"… Anything else?"



"… Things like spider or butterfly."



"… Why are all of them only bugs?"



Toward that splendid lineup Hajime sent a gaze at Suzu as though he was looking at something bizarre. Right away Suzu burst out in tears.



"I don't know-. Just why the monster that my metamorphosis magic can affect is only the bug type! Even though at the sea of trees I can properly tame the fluffy ones-. Orcus is just strange!"



It seemed that it wasn't actually Suzu's own intention. It appeared that she subjugated the bugs as a last resort. The figure of Suzu who was crying in anguish crumbled on the floor invited quite a pity.



Indeed, her monsters were a shuddering sight just from imagining the lineup. However, this place was the abyss, furthermore they were monsters of the lower stratum, compared to the monster in the surface they were far stronger. Putting aside the apostles, they would surely become a reliable enough battle force against the puppet soldiers of Eri and the monsters that Freed had put time to evolve.



"Well, come on, the other side might also show openings from the revulsion, right?"



"Are you telling me to fight while making the enemy disgusted? Suzu's opponent is Eri you know? Even though Suzu wants to talk with her, yet from the beginning I already make her disgusted? Hics, surely Suzu will be thought as bug girl or something… uwah, disgusting, Eri will surely say that…"



"Bu, but but, Suzu-chan! See, you have that child don't you! That one is fluffy, you know!"



"Wai-, Kaorin! Suzu told you that's a secret!"



"Aa? Secret?"



Perhaps because the figure of Suzu feeling down while drawing circle on the floor was too pitiful, Kaori at her side was desperately cheering her up. However, the cheered up Suzu for some reason tried to stop her from talking in a fluster while giving glances at Hajime. Kaori too also returned to her senses and pressed her mouth.



The two who were obviously hiding something made Hajime narrow his eyes. His suspicious eyes were conveying "Don't make a fuss trembling like that, quickly spit it out, ora."



Suzu was making "uu" voice with her gaze wandering while Kaori was making troubled expression wondering what to do.



But, at that time, Myuu who rode 'Belfegor' entered inside the workshop. It appeared that she had something to communicate and she looked straight at Hajime, then she naturally stepped on Ryuutaro whose temple was shot and crouched at the golem's feet. "Gue!?" Felt like such a voice resounded, but no one paid attention.



"Papa! There is rabbit-san nano!"



"Hm? Indeed if it's rabbit then there is one here though."



While tilting his head at Myuu who hopped up and down with both her hands above her head like rabbit ears, Hajime moved his gaze to Shia. Shia too flapped her own rabbit ears up and down.



"That's not it nano. It's a rabbit-san that's not Shia-oneechan nano. It's really strong and cool nano! Even when Lu-chan and Sa-chan and Ma-chan fight it together it doesn't lose nano."



"What? It's attacking here?"



"That's not it nano. See, when the hand of rabbit-san went 'kui-, kui-', seeing that Lu-chan and others said You bastard, in front of princess you dare to challenge us. Very well, we will teach you this thing called one's standing! and then they began a bout? nano!" (TN: The 'kui' is an inviting hand gesture in challenge, like saying 'come at me if you dare'. Also the question mark in front of the word bout is not a mistake. The raw put it there, it means it's doubtful whether the bout is really a bout.)



"… Lusifer and others, they can talk? Furthermore they moved by themselves?"



"? Lu-chan and others always talk, they moved by themselves nano. That's ob-vious nano. Papa, what's wrong?"



"… By the way, right now, what is Belfegor that Myuu is riding right now is saying?"



"Nmyu? … Just wait -su. It's seriously just impossible for me to suddenly begin to fight you know -su. Love & Peace is the best Please teach that to them, master is what he said nano."



"… … … …I see."



Hajime activated his well trained ignoring skill in full power and endured the barrage of questions that he wanted to ask. There was a lot that he wanted to tsukkomi, but for Hajime this was already over his capacity.



And so, for the time being, he only comprehended the part where it seemed the demon rangers called Myuu fondly as princess. This was something extremely weird, but for some reason he didn't feel that it was something dangerous for even a bit, Myuu who was sensitive to ill will since she was kidnapped was emotionally attached to them, so he judged to not worry.



Although now he couldn't grasp the situation, so he asked Myuu to stop the fighting of Lusifer and the others and brought the rabbit here. "Yes nano!" Myuu replied energetically and she exited the workshop together with Belfegor.



"So? The monster that you should have subdued was giving provocation and fought, what is the meaning of this? Furthermore, you don't look like you are doubting that the monster is running wild huh? … What are you hiding? Spit it out."



In order to solve his other doubt, Hajime's gaze moved at Kaori and Suzu who were obviously acting suspiciously.



Thereupon, perhaps they finally resigned themselves, the two opened their mouth.



"Yo, you see, Hajime-kun. That child, he, he is not a bad child, or rather he is special. That child is admiring Hajime-kun, I mean…"



"Ha? Admiring me?"



"Yes! That's how it is! In a sense, Nagumo-kun is also the cause, that's why the moment you see him, at least don't shot him dead okay! Absolutely don't! After all, he is the only fluffy one that agreed to accept Suzu's metamorphosis magic! Really please Suzu beg you!"



"Just what in the world…"



Hajime could only be perplexed at the incomprehensible words of the two.



Right after that, with good timing that 'rabbit-san' or something was led by Myuu and her golems and entered the workshop.



Its figure was certainly a rabbit. Long rabbit ears and reddish black――no, nearly crimson eyes. In its white fur there were several faint streaks of red running. The streaks didn't pulse like other monster, instead they were like a pattern that shined attractively on the white fur. And then, what made the rabbit most peculiar was its hind legs that were developed to impossible degree for normal rabbit.



Even though it was somewhat different, for Hajime its appearance was something too familiar.



"Kyu!"



In addition its cry that sounded cute further stimulated Hajime's memory.



Yes, what appeared in front of Hajime was the monster that once pulverized his left arm and made a sport of him until he was cornered, it was that 'Kick Rabbit'. Of course, it was only the same species and this one was a different specimen.



What was difficult for Kaori and Suzu to say was because they thought Hajime was going to blast the rabbit with no question asked. As expected, in this period where they couldn't pointlessly waste time, they couldn't commit a folly where a monster that had been subdued with great pain got instantly shot to death because of uncontrolled emotion.



"No, it's nothing big, I'm not going to pull the trigger just from seeing this after this long. Rather, this one is a monster that appears at the first level you know? Don't tell me, even though you understand it's weak but because you want a rabbit you went until the upper level… wait, guess you didn't do that. There was just no time that you could do that."



Hajime noticed something strange from what he said and closed his mouth. Come to think of it, the two said baffling things like it was admiring him, that it was special, that he was the cause, that it agreed to accept metamorphosis magic, he recalled all those and his gaze asked for explanation.



However, before the two could explain, the kick rabbit acted first. After it entered the workshop, it immediately stared fixedly at Hajime while strangely trembling in spot, then with *gabacho!* it leaped at Hajime.



To that, Hajime thrust out his hand and easily grabbed the rabbit ears, stopping the kick rabbit in the air while it was crying pleadingly "Kyu! Mokyu! Ukyu". It seemed that it wasn't jumping to attack him.



'What's with this guy', to Hajime who was sending her suspicious eyes, Suzu stepped out to volunteer to translate. It was possible for monster that was subdued by metamorphosis magic to have mutual understanding with its master to a certain degree. Suzu and the others had also attempted the mutual understanding with this kick rabbit, that was how they got the explanation about various things.



"Err, he said, Ou-sama, Ou-sama, I'm extremely happy that I am able to meet you. In this occasion, I heard that I can become stronger and agreed to be made into the servant of your colleague. My best regards. Ah, also if possible, I want to be named by Ou-sama though… is it no good?… what's with those eyes! It's true you know! He is really saying all that!" (TN: Ou-sama=King. Also the rabbit is speaking in Kansai dialect.)



"… Even if, he is talking with that kind of meaning, there is no need to use Kansai dialect, right?"



"Because, Suzu is hearing it in Kansai dialect so it cannot be helped, isn't it!"



Suzu's face turned bright red from being gazed coldly by Hajime and she made excuse.



Looking at Suzu's desperate state, Hajime glanced at the kick rabbit that was still dangling in his hand, and indeed, the rabbit was directing a gaze that actually felt like saying something like that at Hajime. The round and cute eyes were getting moist entreating at him.



Anyway, Hajime further mustered his greatly flourishing ignoring skill and asked about the story at Suzu.



According to Suzu, it went like this.



At first, Suzu wished for a monster as strong as possible and with Kaori's cooperation they chased after the monsters on the ninetieth floor above, but as expected perhaps because the monsters were powerful, even with Hajime's special new artifact that raised Suzu's ability her metamorphosis wasn't really able to subdue them.



Having no other way, Suzu lowered the standard to around eightieth floor and searched the monster with the compass, but as expected it seemed the beast type monster felt that they were above Suzu's patronage with her fresh metamorphosis magic, after that even while thinking 'I don't wanna' but just in case she tried her magic at the bug type monster she encountered, as the result she was able to subjugate them with easiness that caused her wanted to tsukkomi 'what the hell' at all the trouble she met before this.



Even after that, Suzu who was able to subdue monsters limited only to bug type had her tension kept lowering drastically, for the moment she healed her heart gradually by catching a lot of butterfly monsters with beautiful appearance that could manipulate scale powder with various effects, while she was at it she was also subduing giant misshapen bugs in succession without trouble, and then she was about to start going back.



It was at that time. Suzu discovered a 'rabbit' that moved strangely quite human, it came from the stair of upper level full of vigilance, moving from shadow to shadow agilely and silently.



That rabbit also noticed Suzu and the rest, and its movement stopped still. It was a monster that they had never seen even once until now on the eightieth or ninetieth floors. Furthermore, fundamentally a monster wouldn't get out from the floor where they were born, so the act of the rabbit that normally descended the floor until here was obviously abnormal. And so, Kaori came forward with Suzu and Ryuutaro also in maximum alert.



However, as for the rabbit itself… it expressed with its whole body a joy that anyone looking would obviously understand. The severe killing intent and pressure that was characteristic for monsters of abyss were nonexistence. *pyon pyon* The rabbit hopped up and down as though dancing with its rabbit ears moving *myon myon*. The rabbit was like a lost child that finally discovered a human settlement after continuously wandering inside a deep forest for many days.



Kaori and others felt perplexed and hesitated whether they should launch preemptive attacks or not, to them who were like that the rabbit approached near slowly. It was as though the rabbit was taking consideration so that the other party wouldn't get agitated.



While glancing repeatedly at Suzu and co, each time the rabbit advanced a bit it would stop and confirm "Is it okay?" "Is it fine, to approach a bit more?". Looking at such a rabbit, Suzu was knocked out.



To her heart that was stormy from the possibility of her being called as bug queen, the fluffy white rabbit――whose behavior was really cute and instead of hostility it looked friendly――was too powerful. Suzu ignored the warning of Kaori who was still wary and leaped out in front of the rabbit.



"Suzu had decided right from my first impression! Please become Suzu's rabbit!"



Suzu bowed her head and her hand was presented forward, that proposal looked like a confession. By the way, the first impression of Suzu toward the rabbit was that it was a really suspicious rabbit.



That proposal of Suzu made the rabbit got taken aback. And then it tilted its head in bewilderment. This monster looked more and more human.



On the other hand, Suzu who was at her wits' end went 'No way I will let go of this once in a lifetime chance!' like a fan(stalker) that chased after an idol passionately until her residence, her eyes turned bloodshot and her breathing roughened, she began a sales pitch.



Full guarantee of all necessities of life. Three meals a day. No, four meals with afternoon nap included, five days work a week with two days off. Paid vacation provided! In addition, free time also could be negotiated! Furthermore! If the offer was taken right now, oh my, a special magic stone of Suzu would come along free of charge! With this you could say good bye to yourself of yesterday! Now, in this chance, wouldn't you take this status up surrounded by happy comrades in a lovely workplace!?



Kaori and Ryuutaro thought. Surely, no one would take that kind of offer right…



However, unexpectedly the bewildered rabbit, when it heard Suzu's last words――when 'status up' was mentioned, its eyes shined with fierce glared. As though saying "That one, more detaol!" the rabbit pinched forward eagerly and cried "Kyuu! Kyuu!"



Naturally Suzu's lips smirked broadly thinking "He snapped the bait!", even forgetting completely that the other party was a monster, she explained about the mechanism of metamorphosis magic cheerfully.



As the result, the rabbit who understood that he could evolve quietly presented its rabbit ears, accepting to become pretty much Suzu's subordinate monster.



Like this the rabbit became a comrade with that contract of employment?, and with Suzu's metamorphosis magic they attempted mind understanding. Or more precisely, from the start this rabbit was obviously possessing ego with intelligence that was impossible for a monster, with this rabbit as the partner it was possible to have mind understanding even using the 'heart guidance' of soul magic.



Accordingly, Kaori and Suzu heard about the circumstance of the rabbit with really different fur color, it seemed that this rabbit was formerly a same race with the 'Kick Rabbit' that Hajime once killed, and it was also from the same floor, but it descended down the floors in training trip and of all thing it became powerful to the degree that it was able to reach floor eighty with its own strength.



But, that was a behavioral principle and thinking ability that was impossible for a monster. The cause for that was Hajime. More accurately the 'God Water' that Hajime spilled behind.



It seemed that this kick rabbit actually witnessed when Hajime defeated the claw bear. For monster of labyrinth, the floor they were at was the whole of their world, and the master of that floor was the king. To defeat that king meant the birth of new king. They instinctually couldn't help but being careful of that king. At that time, the rabbit which was no different with normal monster was holding the greatest wariness and terror toward Hajime.



For a while, the rabbit was hiding from a distant spot while observing the tendency of the new king, before long, it discovered Hajime's nest――the cave where the god crystal was located. When the rabbit was able to confirm that it was a place he must not approach by his instinctual understanding, the aforementioned Hajime easily went away from the floor.



The rabbit knowing that the master of the nest had gone entered what he thought as a really pleasant and safe nest. And what he discovered inside, piling up on a dent of rock, was a small quantity of water that made vitality to well up staggeringly――the god water.



The rabbit drunk it all up in a trance until it was all gone, and then he felt a power he never felt until that time overflowing in his body. Magic power was naturally surging up, his mind became clear, and he became able to sense the surrounding presence several times more sensitively.



It appeared in the case when a monster drank god water, that kind of effect would happen. There was no way anyone would make a monster to drink a miracle water, so this was something that had never been known.



After that the rabbit went out to search whether there was any more god water, and while kicking around the monsters he encountered――he got too carried away and encountered the claw bear. Any kind of monster would appear again in the labyrinth after some time, but the rabbit who didn't even know of such thing was completely letting his guard down.



After that it was a death match. There was no place to escape based on the place. If the rabbit showed his back then he would be killed. Normally a monster would instinctually felt the difference in status and shrunk back in fear or showed its back and escape, giving an opening from that slip to be instantly killed, but the effect of god water made the rabbit to more or less have thinking capability, he challenged the claw bear half in desperation.



As the result――he survived. Ahead of the verge of death that he surmounted, he awoke to the derivative of his characteristic magic and splendidly pulverized the head of the claw bear with his tough leg. It was a fierce battle that it wasn't an exaggeration to say that the rabbit would die ten times over without the continuing recovery effect of the god water.



The rabbit looked at the previous king that he defeated and trembled. And then, he understood. That a living thing could grow stronger by training.



From there the journey of the rabbit to become strong began. His objective was to go to the new king who gave him the impetus. After catching up, he would show the king how strong he had became and he would say his thanks. And then, he wanted to try looking at a wider world… there he would fight many strong people and reach greater height!



Like that the rabbit who grasped the adverse fate like a certain protagonist somewhere, at that time he didn't have any convenient tool like 'Treasure Warehouse' or anything, when he found by some chance god water that collected even slightly at the dent of the ground from what Hajime spilled, other than a portion that he could save as much as possible he would drink the rest without any other way, and then while attempting to recover and strengthen his own body, the rabbit polished his technique and finally he acquired the strength to descend to floor eighty with his own strength and a thinking ability equal to that of an adult.



"… What's with that development that sounded like something in light novel."



"Kyuu!"



The first thing said by Hajime who finished listened to all the particulars was that. With an absurdly complicated look he moved his gaze at the rabbit who unnoticed was now sitting on his lap while directing round and cute eyes at him.



"Ahaha, isn't that amazing. While going back we tried making him fight, but just with a little metamorphosis magic he got strengthened to a level where he could fight monster at floor ninety one on one without losing you know. This is only a guess but, his movement resembled Shizuku-chan, so perhaps he can also use 'Ground Shrinker' and 'No Beat' I wonder? Also, just from kicking there was shockwave flying out."



"… I see."



Somehow, Hajime felt that just in these few hours he had said those words so many times already.



"Err, and because of that, if Nagumo-kun doesn't mind, this child wanted Nagumo-kun to give him name… because he said that he wanted name from Nagumo-kun, not Suzu."



"Haa. Well, if you are able to make a powerful monster as comrade then let's just consider this great. It feels like there are a lot of tiring developments right now even more than the fight with Ehito and others though… even so a name huh…"



Hajime dropped his gaze at the kick rabbit on his lap. The kick rabbit was looking up at Hajime fixedly. The two stared at each other. And then, Hajime whispered quietly.



"… Mi—y" (TN: A character rabbit named Miffy)



"Rejected."



Kaori rejected it instantly. Her eyes were telling Hajime to apologize at the world famous mascot character.



Hajime pulled himself back together and moved his gaze at the kick rabbit once more. The kick rabbit was also looking at Hajime. And then, Hajime whispered quietly.



"… Peter Rabbi――"



"No good."



"… Udo—ge." (TN: Udonge is a character from Touhou game.)



"I don't know that but I feel like it's no good. Rather, be serious!"



Kaori's scolding flew. Hajime was thinking really seriously so he clicked his tongue at how awful Kaori was, his expression changed feeling how bothersome this was and then he spoke with careless feeling.



"Aah, geez, then you can just use Inaba. Its appearance is rabbit after all." (TN: Seems the name Inaba is often used for rabbit in Japan.)



"Ee, isn't that too simple? Something, a little bit cuter is…"



"Suzu too, Suzu's other monsters are all like that, so a cute name for rabbit-san is…"



It seemed the name was unpopular with Suzu and Kaori. But, right after Hajime said Inaba, the kick rabbit cried "Kyuu!" while jumping up and down *pyon pyon*, perhaps it was feeling something from the name. It seemed that it was pleased.



And like that the reddish black――or rather the nearly crimson eyes that was even more red then the kick rabbits Hajime killed before, the same color like the lines running on his body were gazing at Hajime glitteringly.



"Looks like he is pleased with that name, see?"



"Ee, … well, if the one concerned is pleased then it can't be helped though…"



"Uu, Inaba-chan… after saying it once more, it's unexpectedly cute?"



Both of the girls were reluctant but it seemed for the moment they were consenting.



And, at that time Shia who was watching quietly all the time until now judged that for the present the talk was finished and she approached Inaba. As fellow rabbit ears, Shia's interest was forming toward Inaba. While smiling friendlily she was going to pat Inaba.



"Inaba-chan, I'm glad you got the name. As a fellow rabbit ears, let's get along――"



"Kyu-"



The hand that reached out to pat was casually slapped down. Shia stiffened instantly in place. Inaba sent a glance at the rabbit ears of such Shia and then, "fuh" he snorted.



With blood vein pulsing on her forehead, Shia's gaze turned at Suzu, asking what did this mean. A smile was still pasted on that face.



"Hih, Shi, Shiashia, calm down!"



"I am calm. And? What is this impertinent child is saying?"



"E, err, that…"



"Suzu-san?"



"Hii! Yo, you see, Rabbit ears like you are serving at Ou-sama's sideee, I'm dying from laughter hereee? Polish your rabbit ears before coming back againnn! he said… uhii! No, Suzu wasn't the one saying that!"



It appeared that Inaba felt something toward Shia who was a possessor of the same rabbit ears like him. He entangled his rabbit ears on Hajime arm with his eyes narrowing provocatively. To that Shia whose prided rabbit ears were made fun of also didn't stay quiet.



"… To insult my rabbit ears that Hajime-san loved, that's really a big talk, isn't it. What nerve desu. Which one is worthy to become Hajime-san's rabbit, I'll engrave it into your body desuu!"



"Kyuu!!"



Shia's reinforced fist grazed the nose tip of Hajime. A burnt smell stab the nasal cavity strongly.



On the other hand, Inaba who was attacked beautifully jumped and evaded, invoking his characteristic magic 'Air Force' he rolled and launched a powerful axe kick at Shia. To that, Shia blocked by raising her hand.



And then Shia's beautiful legs were opened in front of Hajime's eyes, it was swung to shoot down Inaba in midair. Above Hajime's head Inaba's kick and Shia's kick clashed, producing fierce shockwave. Hajime's hair was disarrayed.



Without rest. Shia and Inaba moved to inside the workshop while unfolding a fierce exchange.



"Hajime-san's rabbit is enough with one desuu!"



"Kyukyuu!"



After that it went without saying that the two were shot by Hajime whose eyes were half-closed with messed up hair and burnt nose tip. It also went without saying that the surrealism of the shot down smoking two rabbits who were getting along at the corner of the workshop made the cheeks of Kaori and others twitching.



After that, the subdued monsters of Suzu――especially the amount of the butterfly type monsters and their ability were added with further improvement due to Hajime thinking that they had good affinity with Suzu, he also handed over the exclusive artifact for Suzu the 'Twin Iron Fan' and the artifact for transporting the monsters the 'Magic Orb' (Po—ball).



By the way, Ryuutaro who were neglected all that time was also given his artifact properly, he also grasped the way to use metamorphosis magic in his own special way also with Hajme's help, so for the moment there was no problem.



Although the fact that Ryuutaro's way of using the metamorphosis magic by using Tio as reference and how that way was the most compatible for him made Hajime and others got exasperated all together thinking, as expected from a muscle brain.



"At last, it's tomorrow…"



"Yeah. Though it's unknown what's the exact time tomorrow."



The time was just on the brink of late at night period. It was only one more hour until the day that Ehito informed as the day of the great invasion. Depending on the situation, it was also possible that it would start at the same time with the changing of day, so currently Hajime along with Shia were doing the last check regarding the departing preparation.



"Hajime-san."



"Hm?"



" 'Even if for example something happened to me, Hajime and Shia will surely do something somehow. There is nothing at all that I need to be worried about'… she said that."



"… Yue huh."



"Yes desu. And I answered, 'Obviously desu'."



Inside the stretched out time inside the workshop, Shia was doing the final check to the new ability that she obtained half-forcibly using the new disposable type artifact of Hajime while talking with calm voice.



"Three days… that is the time in order for us to take back Yue-san but… at the same time, it is also the time until Yue-san's resistance come to an end."



"… Yeah."



Yes, the time for Ehito to completely grasp Yue's body was also the time limit until Yue was cornered to a state where she was unable to resist. No one said it, but at that time what kind of state Yue would be like… at the very least it was certain that it would be a state where no one could be optimistic about.



"Even so, I believe. That Yue-san is safe. That we will surely take her back. That even if she is unable to resist, Yue-san is believing and waiting for us."



"Obviously. It's Yue we are talking about. No way she is going to lose to that seriously ill chuunibyou that is painful to look at. Much less after she got beaten into shape by Shia just recently."



"Fufu, isn't that right. … But, it doesn't change that the enemy is powerful. He is incomparable with everything until now. A resolve to cross the line of death is necessary for that."



"… What do you want to say?"



Shia twirled toward Hajime and looked straight at him. Blazing flame of rage that her best friend was stolen and killing intent toward enemy, and then the resolve to take her back without fail was residing in those eyes so clearly.



Shia who displayed a spirit to the degree that made Hajime gulped unintentionally, resounded her words of determination.



"I, will be reckless. I will push through rashly. I'm resolving to die without surrender if Yue-san cannot be rescued. I will take even one more enemies to the grave together with me. I want it so my life and death are together with Yue-san."



"… I see. And?"



"Please don't stop me. And then, Hajime-san too please be together with me in this."



Those words were telling him to die together with her depending on the situation. It was an ego that hated to survive only by themselves when only Yue died. And now she was telling Hajime to go along with her egoism, what unbelievable words. If Shia was a heroine in a tale, then those words would be a great disqualification for her.



But, Hajime who was told those words that sounded outrageous was common sense thinking,



"What are you saying after this late? That's obvious, isn't it. Whether we live together, or die together. Those two things are one and the same. After all, Shia, I don't have any intention to let you get away. Don't get cold feet just before the main event, okay?"



Toward Hajime who was showing a fearless smile while saying something even more egoist, however, Shia leaked out a chuckle "kufufu" as though agreeing to that answer.



"Yes desu. I want to form this feeling into words for once. After all, if at the last moment, I get told idiotic things like "Shia! At the very least you have to survive!" Then, I'll lose strength."



"Well, after all according to those guys in class, I am more a demon king than the demon king himself yeah. A demon king won't let go of anything by his own initiative. I won't spit out that kind of shitty cold line okay. Well, there is not going to be any death without surrender or anything. I will get into my hand everything that I want, I'll crush all those that are in the way."



"Ahaha, as expected from Hajime-san desuu. Your line is completely like a demon king――full speed ahead as the villain desuu!"



Shia who laughed humorously for a while shouldering the Vire Doryukken exultantly, showing that she was fully prepared. And then she spoke with a gaze that filled with determination.



"Let's take back Yue-san quickly… and then do the earnestly desired threesome okay!"



"… You spoiled various things, this horny rabbit."



Shia exited the workshop while whispering 'looking forward to it desuu'. Hajime who gave a tsukkomi and exasperated gaze to that back figure, a beat later, saying 'what a hopeless fellow' he floated a smile where affection and trust could be felt.



And then, accomplishing the quota of the mass-produced weapons, Hajime and the others who were fully prepared finally departed from the depth of Orcus Great Labyrinth in order to link up with the surface group.





Chapter 162




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. He also did the edits.



____________________________________________________



Before the Decisive Battle



Shizuku was waiting to welcome Hajime and others ahead of the gate that they passed through.



"Finally you all came. Everyone is waiting. Follow me."



Shizuku only said that before turning on her hell and walked ahead toward the boorish fortress right in front of them, from the plaza where the gate hole was set up.



In a glance it was obvious that it was a fortress of red brick that was constructed in hurry, however the scale of the fortress boasted a degree of completion that was unthinkable that the construction was done in just one or two days. Surely this was the result of overusing artifacts of age of god rank that raised up the ability of cheat earth elementalist Nomura Kentaro and the artisans of the kingdom and empire by several times over.



That fortress and the great plain in front of the kingdom capital where several hundred thousand battle force were camping were illuminated brightly by lighting artifacts, the area was bright like in the afternoon. The [Capital of Hairihi Kingdom] and [God Mountain] that were visible at far away looked different from usual with how it was illuminated with light from outside that shadow was shading it, making anyone seeing it feel a mysterious deep emotion.



The back figure of Shizuku who was leading them illuminated by such artificial light looked extremely ill-humored for some reason.



"Yaegashi, had something happened?"



Shizuku came to a standstill when Hajime unconsciously asked her that, right after that she vigorously turned back and with a brisk walk she approached him and grasped Hajime's arm tightly. Without any pause she buried Hajime's arm between the valley of her breast, it was 'linking arm' posture so to speak. While doing that she urged him forward.



Shia and others blinked their eyes at the unusual boldness of Shizuku's act.



"Oi oi, Yaegashi. Really what's the matter?"



"It's Shizuku. Feels like it's too late already now, but please call me Shizuku. I too will call you Hajime."



"Haa?"



Shizuku sighed tiredly toward the perplexed Hajime while explaining her true intention.



"His majesty the emperor is irritating you know. He tried to put up some kind of made-up reason to put me at his side, he came to make advances to me…yet even so, all of his reasons were logical and on top of that he did what he needed to do perfectly so I couldn't complain at all."



It appeared that Shizuku was fed up because Gahard was making passes at her.



"I told you that it's fine to give out my name at that kind of time right?"



"I told him. That the one that I, lo, love is, Nagu, Ha, Hajime."



"You are being shy there. Then? If he was still coming at you even then you could just contact me right?"



There Shizuku's expression turned from displeasure into a troubled look.



"…I didn't want to be a trouble just from this much. After all, Ha, Hajime is the key of victory of the allied forces. Besides, in order to win against that Ehito, you need to work out various countermeasures correct?"



"It's fine even if you aren't that considerate you know. It would be over just by opening a gate and fill him full of bullets."



"Fufu, because I thought that you would do that I held back from doing that. Even though it is rubber bullet but you are going to attack a leader of a country, isn't it? That's why for compensation, right now spoil me like this. His highness the emperor is also in the conference room so this will be also to flaunt at him though."



"I see."



"Because of that, Shia and others too, allow this a little okay?"



To Shizuku who said that with a little apologetic look, Shia and others also returned a smile telling her to not worry about it.



By the way, Remia and Myuu weren't here with them but there were demon rangers who were accompanying the two. Myuu and Remia also wished to accompany them to the fortress because they could do the chore there, but Hajime obstinately didn't allow that. However, in this dangerous time that threatened the world where a serious affair was concerning Yue-oneechan, to not be able to do anything depressed Myuu's heart in not a slight amount, that was why Hajime attached remote control ability to the living golem.



This ability enabled the controller to share the sight and hearing of the golem from the safe zone that was Orcus's hideout, on top of that the controller could send their instruction precisely. With that Myuu could accept being left because she also had something she could do. Papa was really spoiling his daughter.



Along the way, the soldiers were whispering "That's…" while sending them gaze filled with reverence. Even while feeling shy from those gazes of the soldiers, but by acting spoiled to Haijme, Shizuku was able to endure and also reduced the stress that she got from Gahard, by the time she was able to heal to a certain degree, they arrived at a spacious hall inside the fortress.



A large table was put inside, at the seats of honor were Liliana and Randell, Gahart, and then Alfrerick, Karm, Aiko. They were the center where other people were sitting around them. Aiko was sitting small and quietly with a really nervous look. Just from looking at that it was obvious that the 'Goddess of Harvest' was forced to take the front stage.



When Hajime's gaze looked further around, there were a lot of faces that he knew. Ranzi and Viz of [Ankaji Dukedom], the guild masters Barus, Iruwa, Catherine, and for some reason the clothes store's monst――Christabel. The commanders that he saw in each respective countries and the aides of every representative, in addition, there were also Nagayama and Sonobe as the representatives of the classmates. Furthermore, although Randell was sitting at Liliana's side, but Liliana's presence was stronger, it seemed that Liliana was serving as the representative of Hairihi Kingdom.



The moment Hajime arrived, all of them made expressions that said "So he finally arrived!", next their cheeks cramped from looking how Shizuku was clinging all over him. Looking at the time it wasn't like Hajime was late, but to make the leaders of the world waiting for him and when he arrived he came with a girl waiting upon him, what nerve…that was how the impression looked like.



Although, the aides let go of the matter with only their expression could be seen reacting, but the leaders with authority even among all the leaders here, the representatives of each force were all standing up noisily from their chair.



"Oi oi oi, Nagumo Hajimee. Making Shizuku waiting up on you like that, is that insinuation to me? Aaa?"



"Nagumo-san!? Why are you flirting with Shizuku!?"



"Ya, Yaegashi-san? Se, sensei is, thinking that kind of behavior is not healthy you know? Even though sensei thought that you are a person with a little bit more moderation that sensei can get along with…that's enviou…not that, that's really shameless!"



"You bastaard, in front of Kaori, you laid your hand even to her best friend-! Kaori! Just as I thought I won't give up on you! I will separate you from that demon without faiiil!"



"As expected-, Boss! Even now when your beloved woman is kidnapped, you still have the composure to make a new woman waiting upon you-! Are you going to do a debauched party for the cheering up before the decisive batt-heboo!?"



In order from above, the ones speaking were Gahard, Liliana, Aiko, Randell, and Karm. Karm was sitting at a seat of honor was surely the proof that the name and deed of the head hunting rabbit had permeated everywhere, but looking at his figure that was shot by Hajime and writhed around on the floor, his dignity was nonexistence. Shia at the side was covering her face with both her hands while trembling all over from enduring her shame.



"Shizuku is like this is Gahard's fault, all of it. Say your complaint at him. Also, Gahard, choose, are you going to be a manly woman or stop making a pass at Shizuku."



"My my♡ Hajime-chan, you are going to increase my compatriot for me again? Geez-, you really aren't stingy with your present for mee! I love you!"



Chrystable with her frilly costume that looked like a magical girl which looked painful in various meanings was wriggling her body excitedly while sending Hajime sidelong glances.



Hajime was desperately restraining his impulse to draw out Donner while conveying to Gahard with his gaze that said "I'm gonna turn you into this thing's comrade". Looking at that, Gahard shrunk back in terror that wasn't like the broadminded majestic emperor. For him, it seemed that Chrystabel's queerness was severe.



Those attitudes of the top group which was unthinkable for one to act before the decisive battle where the fate of mankind was gambled made the expression of other people inside the conference room to turn complicated. Should they felt it heartening or joyful that they had composure (seemingly) to act like that, or else should they felt uneasy that they were lacking in tension.



Hajime sat on a chair. Following him, Shia and others also took their seat. It was because they understood the importance of [Holy Precincts] storming group that seats were also prepared for everyone other than Hajime too.



Like that they pulled themselves together and began the last meeting. The placement and distribution of the equipment and weapons, the learning rate of the soldiers, the action guidelines at the time of the grand invasion, the confirmation of the chain of commands, etc., they confirmed all the matters from beginning to end where they ought to be on the same page. It seemed that while Hajime was mass producing artifacts, the top brasses were already talking to each other. In the first place, the human side had been dialoguing with each other for many years and tied an alliance in the preparation for the battle against the devil race, so there was no big problem.



Battle forces of adventurers and mercenaries and so on were also coordinated by the guild masters, so it seemed that they could properly coordinate with the army. That too seemed to be because it was the duty of the adventurers at war.



The problem was the demi-human races which were added to that system, they had their own characteristic chain of command, so forcefully inserting them into the human side was a bad move. And so it seemed the demi-human would be moved to fill the hole like hit and run attack or supporting the human race.



Currently the classmates seemed to become the core who taught the way to use and the effect of Hajime's artifacts, but because the artifacts didn't need particular magic circle or chanting, and also the characteristic convenience of modern weapon where everyone could use it, there didn't seem to be any particular problem in that aspect. Even now if they focused their ear, the sound of explosions and dry sound of shooting could be heard resounding at far away intermittently.



The fortress had been completed for the present, the work being done currently was for constructing the battlefield with things like digging trench and the likes. A fortress was useful for a place to put gun emplacement and taking various line of fire and obstructed the field of vision of the enemy, but the fortress didn't have the ability to oppose the disintegration ability of the apostle, so till the end it was only a simple thing. Their best bet was to make use of Hajime's new artifacts and constructed an advantageous battlefield for them.



"The timeline is really narrow, but somehow it's taking shape. This too is the blessing of the 'Goddess of Harvest' I guess."



Hajime turned his gaze at Aiko and others with a bit of admiration. Actually, he was thinking before this that half of the situation that he was hearing currently wouldn't be in order even now. But the preparation had progressed to a level that surpassed Hajime's expectation, that must be solely because of the existence of a powerful flag.



This was the result of a clear sense of danger and righteous indignation, and also feeling of solidarity that was born inside the people's consciousness. Each people wasn't moving because 'they were told to do so', but because they were thinking that 'I also got to do this' that the preparation could be done this quickly.



"…Isn't that right? In a sense, I felt like I was made to learn once more how terrifying mass psychology is. Aiko-san is scary."



"Wha-. Liliana-san too, you were also inciting the people in high spirits weren't you! Your eyes were teary, you clasped your hands as though you were praying, and then with a lot of heroic you said something like [I will fight. Even if I am alone!]. I saw it clearly that time! When the people who were there had their spirit raised, saying that they will fight together, you secretly laughed weren't you! That time I really felt, a princess is scary!"



"I, I didn't laugh or anything. Please don't say something strange. I wasn't thinking anything like, perhaps I will receive praise from Hajime-san with this, not at all. It's the truth you know?"



"Both the princess and the goddess, whichever of them are plainly creepy. As for me, this can affect the throne of the emperor, so I'm the one that got creeped out the most."



At the side of the princess and goddess who was having a low-level quarrel, was his majesty the emperor who didn't even hide his attitude as though he had seen something unpleasant. Looking further it seemed the elder of the sea of trees, the guild masters, and the lord of the desert also had the same expression. Only the clan head of the head hunting rabbit who was sending a thumb up at Hajime for some reason though.



By the time that they finished speaking about the main points of this and that, when the end of the meeting was approaching, Ranzi of Ankaji Dukedom opened his mouth calmly.



"Nevertheless, for the hero of my dukedom, he finally will be the hero of the world…as expected, it seemed that my decision at that time wasn't mistaken."



The receptionist lady of Brook Town's adventurer guild Catherine nodded deeply as though to agree with that,.



"Since the first time he came to me, I thought that he would do something big for sure. But, never I imagine even in my dream that it would be something as big that controlled the fate of the world…as expected even me couldn't anticipate this."



"That's right isn't it. That time when he rampaged at Fhuren, I thought that he would surely do something even much more than this, I thought that he could possibly be caught up in a strife that is related to the secret of the world but…for that to be a battle where the existence of the world will be at stake. Haa, my stomach hurt. The title of 'The Dagger of Iruwa's Branch Head' is already shamefully unusable with this."



"My? As for me, I understood already from the very beginning. If it's Hajime-chan then someday he would defeat even the devil king. Besides, he was always sending manly woman for me, that was for the preparation of the coming day, I proooperly understood that. A good manly woman also has good sense you know!"



Chrystabel winked intensely. Hajime absolutely didn't attempt to enlarge such excessively dangerous battle force though. Hajime's cheeks were twitching. However, the top brasses starting from Ranzi and others, he saw their eyes that were colored with complicated apprehension that could be taken as sympathy or sorrow, and he guessed Chrystabel's motive of intentionally acting cheerful like that.



Therefore, Hajime shrugged his shoulders as though it was nothing and returned a fearless smile at the members line up here that made him felt nostalgic.



"It's not like this is really strange or anything you know? An idiot self-styled god that cannot read the mood laid his hand on my woman. That's why, he is going to die. That's all there is to it. You guys too, it's only a fight of this level, so survive with some composure to spare okay? When I bring back Yue, we are going to play at the towns of you guys one more time. This time it won't be with any adventure, just a carefree sightseeing yeah."



Naturally it wouldn't be an easy fight just like Hajime said. It would be a deadly combat piled up on deadlier combat, a historical and unprecedented decisive battle of the whole mankind. Without any doubt this was a holy war that would decorate a page of legend. But, exactly because of that, the boasting attitude of Hajime instead encouraged Ranzi and others, they were all "Aa, it can't be helped if we are told that. Let's win." And all the people inside the conference room were also the same like that.



And, at that time, the outside suddenly became noisy. The people in the conference room were going "Uwah, is the invasion starting-" with their faces blurred by tension.



There, a soldier rushed in with flustered look and reported with a loud voice that had hope and awe mixed in it.



"A, a great number of dragon appeared from the teleportation circle at the square! They are the dragon race that comes for reinforcement!"



It appeared that the last reliable ally had come back.



Hajime lifted the corner of his lips and quietly stood up, he exited the conference room taking Shia and others with him. The other people too, after looking at each other for a moment, they chased after Hajime's back while feeling shaken from hearing about the legendary dragon race.



"Goshujin-sama! Thy beloved servant hath come back! Now, let me receive the love!"



Tio who instantly returned from the black dragon form to her human form beautifully ignored her dragonified compatriots and the people at the surrounding who were taken aback from seeing them. She dived toward Hajime's chest.



And so, naturally, Hajime discharged his gun.



*DOPAN-!*



Like that, the familiar sound reverberated, the special rubber bullet hit the forehead of Tio who was panting while performing Lup-n Dive with a look of expectation. (TN: Lupin Dive. Search it in google to see the pose.)



After rotating beautifully three times backward in midair, the back of her head hit hard on the ground before Hajime's eyes.



The place was filled with silence where even bug would hesitate to chirp. Amidst the people who were lost for words from being unable to grasp the situation, the shot down Tio was twitching in intoxication with an expression of ecstasy while her back arched like a bridge, and then she rose up smoothly without any preliminary motion. That disgusting movement and her slovenly expression creeped out the surrounding.



"Th, the punishment after three days long…haa haa, aahn, because I endured too much I felt it excessively…nn-"



"Welcome back Tio. It's great that you made it in time. To arrive in dragonification state of all thing. …That was a good demonstration yeah?"



"Fufu, art not that true? This is the legendary race that hath confined themselves for five hundred years. I thought that if we art going to do this then we might as well act the role to raise the morale. …Yes, it's great that we art able to strike them all dumb."



As expected, the surrounding couldn't follow the pace of Hajime and Tio who progressed the talk as though nothing happened. Rather than saying that the people were struck dumb by the arrival of the dragon race, the exchange of Hajime and Tio was the main reason they were struck dumb, but Tio puffed up her chest thinking that her plan succeeded.



"Tio-san, welcome back. But, if I have to say just in case, I think that this difficult atmosphere is because they are shown the relationship between Hajime-san and Tio-san that is showed too naturally even though it's abnormal you know?"



"Yep. I have been thinking this many times before but, Hajime-kun too is mostly in harmony with Tio-san isn't he."



"In a sense, it feels like Hajime has to be Tio-san's master no matter what huh, like that? My own familiarity that feels that this is natural even though it should be a spectacle to be shocked about is scary."



Shia, Kaori, and Shizuku who were unable to be indifferent? were making tsukkomi with an exasperated face. Hajime and Tio were staring in puzzlement. It seemed that in various meaning it had been already too late for them to be treated.



It was at that timing that the six dragons that appeared in the square shined, the next moment six silhouettes of human appeared. All of them were male. Their muscular appearance was wearing clothes that looked similar to Tio's Japanese clothes. Every one of them was handsome guy. But, their hair colors were colorful, the color resembled the color of their scale when they transformed into a dragon. Scarlet, indigo blue, amber, navy blue, gray, deep green, the colors were all over the place.



From among them, the scarlet haired person, a man past middle age that emitted out a remarkable dignity walked forward until in front of Hajime and others. Liliana and others who chased behind Hajime――the leaders of each country were also here. Certain footsteps that weren't timid at all even in front of those leaders and a 'weight' that was like a really big tree was approaching, those factors were making everyone comprehending in a really natural way, that 'this person was king'.



Liliana, Gahard, Alfrerick, and others, the leaders of each country were slightly faltering due to this great man, however, the man's eyes narrowed the moment he saw Hajime who warded off his pressure like a flexible willow. Those eyes weren't giving dangerous look, but it was a gaze where deep interest and admiration were mixed.



"Hairihi Kingdom's Liliana S B Hairihi-dono, Helsha Empire's Gahard D Helsha-dono, Fea Belgen's elder Alfrerick Haipist-dono. This is our first time meeting. I, am the leader of dragon race, Adol Claus. In the peril of this occasion, we the dragon race will also ask to be allowed to participate. Our compatriots are still waiting in the village and they can be summoned through the gate anytime. They will surely be useful at the battle against apostle. Please take care of us."



His voice wasn't loud by any mean, rather it even made the listener felt calm, even so the words could be heard even by the soldiers who were looking from afar at the corners, they raised a commotion "Oo" hearing the man's words. The race that only made their entrance in the legend was really surviving until now, and in this time of crisis they would fight together with them. With how the dragon race had displayed their dragon form from the beginning, the morale of the soldiers looked like it increased by quite a lot.



Liliana and others returned the greeting unanimously where Adol responded by nodding generously. It seemed that his personality was gentle, contrary to his stern appearance. He made anybody felt an intellectual tolerance that could envelope everything. Perhaps it should be said as expected from a race that Yue once treated as an example. This man was exactly a proper dragon race.



Hajime and other filled their eyes with disappointment in full power and sent their gaze at Tio. "Hm?" Tio cocked her head in puzzlement. It was as though she didn't understand why they looked at her like that.



In order to talk about the action guidelines when the invasion came, Adol was going to head to the conference room with Liliana and others. It was unrelated to the [Holy Precincts] storming group, so Hajime and others stayed behind. He had reunited back with Shizuku and Tio so it was necessary to hand over artifacts to them and talked about their action plan when they entered [Holy Precincts].



But, before that a dragon man with indigo hair was walking toward Hajime's direction. Actually at the point of time when Hajime appeared, this man immediately directed a fierce glint of eyes at Hajime, but it seemed that he understood the right place and time and waited until Adol's greeting was over. He was a good looking man in the age of early twenty. Come to think of it, all the dragon race people who came were all amazingly handsome guy.



"…You bastard. Just what in the world you had done to princess?"



The indigo-haired man asked that while glaring straight at Hajime with a voice that sounded like he wanted to kill. Hearing that, Hajime exposed a rare puzzled expression and he turned his gaze at Liliana's direction, Not just Hajime, everyone would think about Liliana if they heard the word 'princess'.



Gazes gathered at Liliana wondering if she had some kind of relationship with the dragon race that had been hiding from the front stage all this time, but Liliana herself had no knowledge of that at all and she shook her head left and right vigorously.



"Where are you looking at! If a dragon race says the word princess then it's obviously about Tio-sama!"



Those words made Hajime and co stiffened. They moved their gaze at Tio in a state where the sound of *gi-gi-gi* almost could be heard from their stiff movement. To that, Tio's cheeks puffed into crimson and she averted her gaze, as though she was a male in puberty that went shy because his classmates came to know that his family was calling him with '-chan' added.



Hajime murmured.



"Princess?"



Shia murmured.



"Princess?"



Kaori murmured.



"Princess?"



Shizuku murmured.



"Princess?"



And then, everyone whispered with their voices in unison.



" " " " "No waayy" " " " "



Tio howled.



"Wha, what! Is it bad if I am called princess! I am more or less the granddaughter of the clan head, so it's not strange even if I am called that!"



"Aaaa, yeah. You're right, princess Tio. It's nothing bad at all, princess Tio."



"Forgive me princess Tio. It sounds bad for some reason but, you are asking us to call you princess Tio from now on aren't you, princess Tio?"



"Ye, yep, it's not strange at all you know? Princess Tio? Yep, I think it sounds fine you know, princess Tio."



"I, I think it's fine. Even if, it sounds like that but a princess is a princess isn't it? Princess Tio."



Tio whose face was dyed bright red from shame was trembling while she howled once more with teary eyes.



"Nugaa―! Stop it already! I feel extremely embarrassed somehow! I beg all of thou, call me just like how it is until now! This kind of shame doesn't feel good for even a bit!"



"What's with you, isn't it fine princess Tio. Isn't it cute princess Tio. It has amazing echo you know princess Tio. Teach us this kind of thing sooner princess Tio. From here on too you will forever be princess Tio."



"Stop it alreadyyyyy"



Approaching Tio who crouched down while covering her face and her body writhing, Hajime further called her princess repeatedly into her ear. In his face sadism and affection were splendidly existing in harmony, it was an 'S' face that could be called superb. As expected, Tio(pervert)'s master could be no one but Hajime. Everyone was comprehending that while sending their exasperated gaze at Hajime.



There, inside the atmosphere that became strange, the indigo haired man raised his voice at Hajime with a gaze that looked like a devilish homicide.



"You bastaard, what disgrace are you doing toward princess…as I thought, you are using some kind of suspicious artifact to brainwash her right!"



Somehow that statement closely resembled a certain hero (lol) somewhere.



"Hey, Ristas. Don't say something so rude to Goshujin-sama. I had said this many times, but I long for Goshujin-sama from my heart. No matter even if thou art someone like my younger brother, I won't stay quiet if you are too rude."



"-, princess! You are being tricked! Please open your eyes!"



"Muu, really someone like thou. On what basis thou art saying such thing."



The indigo-haired man that was called Ristas by Tio, when he was looked at by Tio with a gaze as though she was looking at a child throwing tantrum, it was as though his store of patience finally ran out, he raised angry voice from his heart, from his heart that was filled with extremely fierce emotion.



"There is no way the princess of dragon race is this kind of pervert-!!!"



" " " " "Indeed." " " " "



All of the people in that place nodded in unison. Certainly, what he pointed out was truly correct.



"Before princess left the village, she was wise and compassionate, her strength was also surpassing the clan head. She was a great lady to whom everyone harbored affection and reverence! By no means she is a person who will show expression of ecstasy from pain, or someone who would make a smile that look strangely joyful while she was crouching in shame and writhing from verbal abuse, she wasn't that kind of person at all! It's only natural to think that the human over there had done something sinister to her!"



" " " " "Indeed." " " " "



Once more all the people in that place nodded in unison. Indeed, what he pointed out was the most correct.



"No, not to mention, for princess to call that kind of human youth, Go, Goshujin-sama or, or or or, or the likes! Impossible!"



Tio when she was at the hidden village of dragon race was surely a charming woman that no one could find fault at as the granddaughter of the clan head. Right now she was a hopeless pervert that couldn't be saved anymore, but her wisdom and prudence that she displayed at every turn, and then her deep compassion and courage that wouldn't consider even her own safety when it was for the sake of her comrades, all of those were also Tio's charm that had been conveyed enough at Hajime and others.



Looking from the view point of the dragon race people who only knew about Tio's good point, Tio who had turned into a pervert looked completely like a different person. Most likely when she returned to her village, in the process of showing the recorded image and explaining about Hajime and others, she freely displayed her perverted nature without restraint to her fellow clan.



When she came back, the princess that was loved by everyone had turned into a massive pervert…it was really easy to guess what would they think in their heart.



But, even so it also felt like that Ristas's fury was a little too far. The dragon people other than him didn't send gaze that was that unfriendly at Hajime. Rather they looked like they had interest at what kind of human the man that Tio chose.



Ristas looked like he was further heating up and about to argue even more vehemently, but it was at that time a remonstrating voice resounded.



"Ristas, act properly."



"Cla, clan head…but!"



Although Adol remonstrated Ristas, Ristas's expression wasn't accepting that. To such Ristas, Adol opened his mouth with his eyes squinting in amusement.



"This is something that Tio chose herself. If she is really brainwashed, there is no way I wouldn't notice it. The fact is that Tio is longing for him from her heart. Although Tio's change knocked me out of my wits, but…"



"Then!"



"But, that change too, if it makes Tio happy then I don't mind. That child was tired of the life in the hidden village. She had faithfully protected the law from her own pride as a dragon and her own position but…there is no doubt that her heart was drying from continuing to harbor dark and heavy matter without any outlet. She departed for the mission of this time half-forcibly was surely because she unconsciously was searching for 'something'. Tio had found that 'something'. And then, she is smiling in happiness. Isn't that enough?"



"Tha, that is…"



"Jii-sama…" (TN: Grandfather.)



Ristas was at lost for words. And then, Tio's expression too also loosened up from the gaze filled with affection that Adol sent to her.



"Besides, Ristas. For a dragon race, to dress up your jealousy with official stance and vent your anger, that is not an admirable thing to do you know?"



"Wha, what are-"



"What are you getting agitated for. You trained yourself day by day following Tio's words that she wouldn't take a spouse that is weaker than herself, that matter is known by all the people in the village. Did you think that it wouldn't be known after you continuously challenged the fiancée candidates of Tio into a match?"



Adol's expression turned a bit exasperated at Ristas who showed his agitation. When Hajime turned his gaze at Tio at his side, Tio looked back at him with an expression that looked troubled. It appeared Tio also knew about Ristas's feeling. Furthermore with a small voice, "Those guys art also fiancée candidates" she turned her gaze at the other dragon people.



They were talking in small voices with deep interest, their faces close to each other with their eyes narrowing at Hajime and Tio. Ristas's eyes lifted up once more. Of all thing, it seemed that Tio at the village was seriously a popular girl. At the very least they idolized her so much that even when her clan members had seen her perverted figure they didn't immediately get disillusionment.



Adol asked to Liliana and others "Please give me a bit of time", and then his gaze turned at Hajime.



"I am glad to meet you, Nagumo Hajime-kun. I heard about you from Tio. I was also shown the recording of the battle at the devil king castle. It was splendid how you slaughtered a god. For us, even if we faced such opponent in a group we would be no match at all."



"Nice to meet you, Adol-dono. I am the reason that caused a strange door to open for your granddaughter. The decisive battle will be soon, but I have the resolve for at least getting a punch in the face."



The surrounding was making a stir. The reason was mainly because of Hajime's honorific language. Here and there comments like "Someone cast healing magic-!" or "The demon king went mad!" or "In this kind of time the trump card of mankind is…the world is already over-!" could be heard.



At the same time, Hajime's body was enveloped in light. It was a healing magic from Kaori. Shia was readying her Vire Doryuken. She was thinking that Hajime would be fixed by hitting him. Shizuku was covering her face. It was as though she was witnessing a tragedy that couldn't be recovered from.



And then Tio at his side was creeped out and drew away from him.



Hajime's cheeks were grandly twitching.



"Hmm. It seems that you are a little different from the image recording and the story that I heard but…from the reaction around us it looks like this is different from your usual."



"Well, you are Tio's family. If it's against the clan head of dragon race then I'll talk normally, but if it's Tio's grandfather, then I'll pay attention to my speech at least."



"Hou! So it's because I am Tio's grandfather. Fufu-, I see, I see."



Adol smiled broadly feeling a little happy at Hajime's words. His dignified aura until now instantly dispersed and his air became like a good-natured old man. Even the creeped out Tio, when she heard the reason for Hajime's abnormal attitude, her expression turned bright and soft as though she was made to eat something sweet.



"Then, this is a great chance. How about I call you Hajime-kun. Hajime-kun, I don't have any plan to punch you. I also said this just now, but if Tio can smile from her heart then that's enough for me. Rather, I'm happy that you can accept this stubborn person who for the sake of her own creed persisted to be unmarried for five hundred years."



"Is, that so?"



"Yes. If she is happy then things like a fetish or anything is trivial matter. Rather than that, what I want to ask is regarding your beloved princess."



Hajime whose expression turned complicated from Adol's large-hearted statement now made a doubtful expression from those words. If talking about his beloved princess then he couldn't think of anyone except Yue.



"I had seen the image recording. I was surprised that the young vampire princess is alive. And then, for my granddaughter to love the same person with her, truly, fate is something mysterious. Princess Aleytia…no, she is Yue right now isn't she. That girl is your most beloved correct?"



"Yes, that's right."



Adol didn't really show any change of expression when he heard Hajime answering instantly. He just nodded. In exchange, the other dragon people narrowed their eyes dangerously. Ristas too right now looked like he wanted to raise angry yell. Surely they couldn't stomach that Hajime was building a relationship that was more than friendship with Tio while saying that another woman was his most beloved.



"I too am a grandfather that is thinking of my granddaughter. At the occasion of the great persecution five hundred years ago, I swore to this child's parents who lost their lives――to my son and his wife. That I will protect her without fail. Therefore, if you are saying that you cannot love Tio, even if Tio say that she doesn't mind with that, as expected I cannot just accept that. The feeling of wanting to entrust the beloved granddaughter is what is called parental love isn't that correct?"



"Indeed."



Adol's gaze stabbed straight at Hajime.



Surely Adol wanted to ask. What was the true feeling of Hajime toward Tio. Exactly because Adol understood that Tio would step into [Holy Precincts] with Hajime, and also because he understood that he would commit to deadly combat against the apostles, in this time where it was possible that he would part away forever with his granddaughter in this life, that he couldn't help but wanting to know about the partner that his granddaughter gave her heart to.



Hajime slowly ran his gaze at the surrounding. To Ristas and others of the dragon race, Shia and others, Adol. And then, lastly to Tio.



Tio blushed slightly from being stared directly by Hajime and she was going to take a step back from the pressure she felt.



But, Hajime's arm reached out before she could step back. When that arm caught the waist of Tio who was going to draw back, it then pulled Tio close to him strongly. It really looked like as though Hajime was saying that this woman belongs to me. Tio was turning redder and redder. She looked really meek to the degree that made one wanted to tsukkomi just what happened with the usual pervert.



Hajime faced Adol once more with his arm still embracing Tio. And then, he opened his mouth with a calm but powerful voice.



"Recently, everyone said it really often, that I am like a demon king."



"Hmm?"



"That's why, I will take everything that I want, and send flying everything that is in the way."



The outsiders went noisy. Adol was listening quietly. Hajime declared clearly to the listening Adol.



"I want Tio."



Tio who was embraced by Hajime twitched noticeably. Her eyes opened widely while she stared at Hajime wholeheartedly.



"No matter what Tio is thinking, that's already irrelevant. I have no intention to let her go now after this far. Indeed, Yue is my most beloved but…even so, I feel that Tio is lovely. That's why――"



"That's why?"



Adol asked. Hajime turned his gaze at Ristas and others for a moment, then he showed a fearless smile at Adol while declaring.



"Tio already belongs to me. If anyone cannot stomach that, then try to steal her with all your might. No matter when, no matter how many times, I'll take on anyone."



Those excessively unreasonable, selfish, and preposterous words made everyone who watched over the course of events with the dragon race people first on the lead to be lost for words. Only Shia and others were making an expression that seemed to say "Can't be helped huh".



And then, as for Adol who was curious of Hajime's true feeling,



"Certainly you are an incarnation of unreasonableness――just like a demon king in a fairy tale. Fufu-, I see. So my granddaughter has fallen into the hand of demon king huh. In the hand of the demon king that might save the world. Kuhaha-"



He raised a laughing voice that sounded amused. After laughing like that for a while, he turned his gaze at Tio and nodded as though consenting to something.



"That's a good face. I have never seen your expression like that in the village at all. It's just like your explanation in the village, you are loved by everyone, and then you are in love with them."



"Jii-sama. Exactly. Not only Goshujin-sama, I also love Yue and others. And then, right now I'm convinced. That everyone also loves me. I am too happy that it feels like right now I can murder even a god by myself."



Adol whose smile deepened even more from Tio's reply calmly straightened his posture and turned his gaze at Hajime. And then he lowered his head.



"Then, demon king-dono. I ask you along with your beloved people, please take care of my granddaughter."



"…Indeed, I have received your request. I will protect her until the end of this life of mine."



Hajime's way of talking returned back to honorific language once more, to that Adol looked like a weight had fallen off from his shoulder, he nodded with relieved expression and then turned on his heel toward Liliana and others. He apologized for taking time for his personal matter while urging them toward the conference room. He also took the opportunity to breathe life back into Ristas and others who had faltered from Hajime's declaration and urged them to follow him.



Liliana and Aiko were directing expression that looked absurdly jealous, and possibly even greedy toward Hajime, but urged by the surrounding they helplessly returned back inside the fortress even while they kept sending glances back with reluctance.



The onlookers were scattering gradually with the disappearance of the leaders, but the remaining people, especially the classmates who had gathered unnoticed were sounding out gossips like "Damn, Nagumo is seriously an ero game's MC" or "Haa haa, maou-sama(TN:Demon king-sama)…haa haa" or "That's just too unreasonable…but, I also want someone to act that unreasonable for me!" or "Hajime-sama's harem…if I added myself nonchalantly into there, it's possible".



Amidst such atmosphere, Tio who was clinging on Hajime's chest with slovenly expression "nihee~" softly separated herself from him.



"Goshujin-sama. Those were truly, truly joyful words. However, there is one thing that I wished to confirm. For Goshujin-sama to speak your feeling for me that clearly, surely that's not because Goshujin-sama hath been thinking of the final possibility isn't it?"



If those words came out from a feeling of him wanting to convey his feeling because he thought they might die in this battle, then Tio had to warn Hajime. But, based on what Hajime saw from Tio's expression, it seemed that until the end it was nothing more than just her confirming it without her really believing that Hajime was thinking like that.



"A vow to be together in the time of death and thinking that we might die are different things. Naturally, the one who will die are those guys, not us. There is not even a speck of a chance for us to die. I merely didn't want to take a half-assed attitude in front of your family."



"Kufufu, I see I see. Then that's fine. God or whatever isn't worthy to be feared. After all I feel like I can defeat even Ehito alone if it's the current me. Let's take back Yue and then do 'pii-' and 'pii-' with everyone happily!"



"…That's why, whether it's Shia or you, in the end you girls just spoiled up everything."



Behind Hajime, Shia was laughing "Ahaha, desuu~" shamelessly.



For the time being they changed the spot because they wanted to be spared of being a spectacle more than this. It was only the members of storming group that gathered at a corner of the fortress's rooftop and spent their time to master the artifacts or resting. There was still a few more hours until the sunrise, but no one tried to take a nap. In this situation where it was unclear when the great invasion would begin, no matter how much they relaxed but the subconscious tension couldn't let their mind to fall asleep.



In this kind of time, even Hajime who usually displayed a thick nerve, his sleepiness was naturally blown away when he thought of Yue. Right now he was just earnestly polishing his killing intent toward Ehito.



Before long the sunrise arrived. The face of the shining sun peeked out from the east horizon, large shadow stretched to the west.



The warm sunlight illuminated the world, at that time when the sun that blazed bright red completely revealed its appearance, Hajime quietly opened his closed eyes, and then he murmured.



"They came."



It was at that moment.



The world was dyed reddish black and rumbled.



And then, ahead of the gaze that Hajime and others directed, a crack ran on the sky of God Mountain, there the abyss peeked out its face.



It began.



For god, this was the world's…



For mankind, this was the toyed history's…



Beginning of the end.





Chapter 163




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Elementalcobalt did the edits.



_______________________________________________________________



Peerless Outbreak of War Without Self-Restraint



The world was dyed reddish black.



It wasn't the orange color of the morning glow. It stirred up the people's unease further, a color that forced anybody to bear instinctive revulsion that was awfully eerie, fanning up one's fear. If it had to be said, it was the eye of a monster, as though the whole world was imprisoned inside the eyes of a monster. Even the beautiful sun that shined radiantly, right now it was merely a reddish black star floating in the east sky.



And then a strange sound was reverberating through the strange colored world. The world itself was rumbling. The ground too, the air too, the world was screaming while trembling with fear.



The people were made to understand that whether they wanted it or not, the end of the world was beginning. Amidst such an atmosphere, an even louder sound of destruction reverberated.



The soldiers, knights, mercenaries, demi-humans, everyone in the fortress trembled. Their gazes moved everywhere. Thereupon, on the sky above God Mountain something that looked like a line became visible. When the people focused their eyes in wonder, the line warped distortedly, then once again the line raised crackling sounds and spread in all directions.



"The sky… is splitting…"



Someone whispered that. It was truly a murmur that was right to the point. The distorted line occurring in the sky was a crack that ran right through space itself.



That crack fanned up the terror in people's heart, while the sound of destruction was played to the world, the crack was slowly spreading.



"-, All hands-! Prepare to fight-!"



A command mixed with scolding was handed down toward the soldiers who were dumbfoundedly mute. It was the angry roar of Gahard whose voice was amplified using an artifact. It seemed that he also got knocked out of his wits. But as expected from the representative of a military country, he was the first one who pulled himself back together among the top brasses.



That command released the soldier from their binding. They moved all at once in order to fulfill the role that was given to them.



Even as the crack above God Mountain was increasing in size, by the time the soldiers were deployed, the space was finally completely pulverized along with a thunderous roar.



Fragments of space were blown away everywhere and sparkled like glass. Like a chasm that was opened in the ground, the abyss was peeking from that thing that materialized in the sky. It was a deeply thick darkness that was the exact opposite of the golden whirl that made one feel its solemnity which Ehito and the others used to return to the Holy Precincts. In place of the whirl there was something viscous like miasma spurting out.



From there, black rain was pouring down. No, it only looked like rain――it was a great number of monsters. From the chasm in the space the monsters were raining down on the summit of God Mountain. The numbers already surpassed tens of thousands. At any rate, it was in the amount that the soldiers who looked up from the ground could see it as black rain. It was a terrific number that easily reached millions, or possibly even tens of millions.



The heavy rain of black monsters painted the summit of God Mountain black in the blink of an eye, and then the blackness began to descend down like an avalanche.



Furthermore, from the chasm of space that was covered in black miasma, this time white rain was released horizontally. At the reddish black sky the white――no, the silver rain was really visible.



"The number of the apostles is also not half-baked, huh."



The one who whispered with a grim look was Gahard. With his body wrapped in battle clothing, as the general of the allied force he came out to the front line together with the subordinates under his direct control. A 'telepathic communication' from the supreme commander of the allied force, Liliana reached his ear.



{Your majesty Gahard. Please don't go too far to the front. It's fine for you to die only after the battle is over.}



{Hah, you really said that. But, the strongest man in the allied force has to fight at the very front. If I die then I die, you just need to use my death to blaze up the soldiers. You supreme commander and that goddess are for that sake right.}



{Good grief… your majesty, 'goddess' and 'sword' are going out. Just as planned, please take care.}



{Yeah-, leave it to me!}



The general of the allied forces, in a manner of speaking, was the supreme commander in the field. Originally, Gahard who was the top of a military country should become the supreme commander, but giving a reason that there was no way the most skilled man could just shut in himself inside with a war going on outside, he stubbornly refused to be stopped from going out.



Although it wasn't like that, Liliana was unsuited to become the supreme commander. She was a royalty, in anticipation of the battle against the devil race in the future she learned tactic and strategy. Rather than Gahard whose character was for the front line, the girl who was extolled as the 'Kingdom's Prodigy' was more suited instead to take command of the whole from the rear with an overlooking view.



Other than possessing the courage to run away from the capital alone, she also knew the importance of making a clear decision calmly; furthermore, in regard of barrier magic, she was excelling in base defense as an expert. And if she was accompanied with the skilled aides of each country, then it could be said that she was more than suited as a supreme commander whether in the aspect of status or morale raising.



And then, other than the general and the supreme commander, there was one more person who was given an important role.



"Everyone of the allied forces-. All of you brave warriors that stand up against the crisis of the world! Please don't be scared! The divine protection of god is with us! We will be protected, all of us, from the evil god who tricked god and bared his fang against mankind right now-. In this point of time where everyone took up your weapon and stand in this place, all of you are already hero! Everyone of you are the warrior of god! Now-, let's yell together with this 'Apostle of God' the 'Goddess of Harvest'! We will not lose against evil no matter what-. What we are going to grasp is only 'victory-!!"



Immediately, the soldiers of the allied force who was making tragic expression from terror while desperately holding down their trembling body, like a traveler who found an oasis after wandering in the desert for many days, their eyes shined with hope.



The 'Goddess of Harvest' pouring down her voice from the summit of the fortress, the flag bearer of the leaders of the allied force――Aiko, the soldiers directed their gaze that had recovered their strength and determination to her and stamped their feet all at once.



*DON DON-, DON-. DON DON-, DON-* The fifty hundred thousand soldiers who shook the ground rhythmically at the next moment roared in unison even without practice beforehand.



" " " " " " " " " "VICTORY! VICTORY!! VICTORY!!!" " " " " " " " " "



"Ruin for the evil god! Glory for mankind!"



" " " " " " " " " "RUIN FOR THE EVIL GOD-!! GLORY FOR MANKIND-!!" " " " " " " " " "



Aiko was desperately recalling the content of 'You Can Do It, Agitator! Compilation of Lovely Speech Case by Case' given to her by Hajime while sending her voice that was amplified by an artifact to the battlefield.



"The servant of the evil god is not worthy to be feared! Oh 'my sword'! Show that proof right now!"



The instant Aiko yelled that, an amplified calm voice echoed through the whole battlefield.



"As you command, my goddess."



Right after that, the soldiers who looked up to Aiko saw the silhouette that leaped up from behind Aiko.



White haired eye-patched black coated young man――Hajime was standing still on air where there was nothing, and then he lifted above his head a jewel that looked like diamond that he took out from somewhere. Then, that jewel shined radiantly like sun and illuminated the soldiers. Looking from their point of view, it was as though a halo was shining behind Aiko. This too was Hajime's production.



Hajime floated a wide fearless grin.



A beat later, that happened.



A part of the reddish black sky momentarily flashed, instantly, a part of the mountain surface of God Mountain that was in the process of changing color from being covered by the avalanche of black monsters was entirely blown away along with tremendous thunderous roar.



Right after that, just when it seemed the sky flashed, many things were further raining down to the God Mountain, the mountain with a height of eight kilometer above the sea was crumbling just like a sand mountain created on the beach that got pushed down by a kid.



It was a bombing that poured down straight from heaven. But it wasn't by missiles packed with explosives. What Hajime was doing was simply raining down large mass of metal lumps to free fall on God Mountain.



So to speak, it was Meteor Impact.



As expected, if Hajime made it drop from space then the impact would reach even the fortress, so he dropped the mass from inside the stratosphere, but even so the energy from several ton of metal lump freefalling had the destructive force that average explosive couldn't match.



Furthermore, this attack was falling randomly in local area in the unit of few hundreds.



Along with thunderous roars that could rupture the ear drum, the highest peak of the sacred mountain that was a pride of the world was collapsing like a joke. Rain of monster? Rain of apostle? Then I'll make it rain meteors! It was as though such a thing was said. Of course, Hajime thought that the same golden whirl like before would manifest, so it was completely a coincidence that both sides were making rain.



However, as though to make the comparison between the strength of the two sides, the allied force's soldiers were shown the spectacle of the God Mountain crumbling before their eyes along with the extermination of several tens, hundreds of thousands of monsters, their reaction was…



" " " " " " " " " "――――" " " " " " " " " "



Trembling. Not from fear. From joy. And also from the fighting spirit welling up inside their chest.



Right after that, shouts that weren't even losing against the thunderous roar of the God Mountain along with the monsters' extermination were raised, it even felt like the shouts could drive away the fierce cloud of dust approaching them.



" " " " " " " " " "UOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOHH――――!!!!!! " " " " " " " " " "



From the bottom of their stomach, while their body trembling from the scene that came out exactly from legend, they roared from the bottom of their stomachs. They stamped their feet *DON DON*, heightening their fighting spirit without end!



" " " " " " " " " "AIKO-SAMA BANZAI! GODDESS-SAMA BANZAI!! " " " " " " " " " "



――God Mountain demolition right after the start of battle.



The enemy had purposefully taught them from where they were going to attack. Then, it was fine to just blow away the place where they were coming out from, that was how it went. Of course, Hajime had also prepared something else in case it was a lie, but from what he saw at Ehito's expression that was full of superiority complex in the end, Hajime presumed that the possibility that he was lying was low.



The destruction of the God Mountain made the movement of the apostles in the sky also stop as expected. However, in the next moment they approached the fortress with a fierce speed while matching their movements like a mass of flying birds without a single disorder.



The capital that was in a half-destroyed state due to the crumbling of the god mountain was further enveloped by the approaching cloud of dust, without stopping the dust approached the fortress like a sandstorm. To that, Hajime took out a different jewel and made it shine.



"We were thoroughly made a fool by you guys before. There is no way this is the end with just this much right? Just like Icarus, fall down with your wings burning, all of you puppets."



Right after that heavy rain of light that split apart the atmosphere poured down.



――Sunlight convergence laser Burst Hyperion



The restored annihilation weapon released light of ruin from the sky. Not just a single line, at the altitude of ten kilometers, a total of seven Burst Hyperions were floating, controlled by the jewel that Hajime was holding, with pillars of light piercing down.



Like the tower of Babel, seven pillars of light connecting heaven and earth were swallowing in one go the apostles who were drawing near to the allied forces in a straight line from the chasm in the space.



The apostles who were annihilated unaware were uncountable.



There were a lot of apostles who attempted to defend by deploying their silver wings clad in disintegration ability, but this improved version of Hyperion that had been explosively evolved in heat quantity, convergence rate, lasting time, and so on couldn't be compared with the previous Hyperion. Against this even the characteristic ability of the apostles were pierced and their god constructed bodies were turned into cinders.



The apostles who somehow escaped from the firing lines and the apostles who only now came out from the chasm in the space stopped still, but a moment later they soared to the sky with terrific momentum. They flapped their silver wings and flew along the pillars of light where ahead of them were the astonishing weapons that annihilated their fellow apostles in hundreds.



"Don't be reserved. There is still more to come, eat up to your heart's content. Stuff yourself until your whole body burst out yeahh-"



Using the 'distant viewing stone' loaded on Burst Hyperion, Hajime saw the figures of the ascending apostles, his lips warped ferociously while saying that. At the same time, the diamond jewel shined even further.



Then, from all the Burst Hyperion that had total length of around five meters, several small type bits――'Mirror Bits' were flying out, they went toward the surface or scattered to the surrounding. The bits with isosceles triangle shape and size around thirty centimeters had crimson gem installed on their surface.



The mirror bits scattered as though to evade the charging apostles, to that the apostles frowned suspiciously for a moment, but seemingly judging that it would suffice to destroy the Burst Hyperion where they bits were coming from first no matter what scheme the bits served, they ignored the bits and continued charging ahead.



And then, the apostles focused their silver magic power, and at that instant where they were going to attempt to destroy the seven weapons emplaced at the sky with disintegration bombing,



"-!? This is-――"



One of the apostles that leaked out that voice had her head erased before she could finish talking.



It was by the laser right from behind.



The firing of Burst Hyperion stopped just for a moment. Immediately after, the lasers split into branches like a scattered shot and rained down to the ground… was how it looked like but an instant later, lasers from all directions filled the whole sky to the brim.



That was a cage that was instantly created from laser. Countless lasers from directions that were totally different from Burst Hyperion's positions were expanding through the whole sky as though laying out three dimensional web.



"Kuh, so it's that small artifacts-"



One of the apostle who attempted to defend by deploying her maximum disintegration ability through her silver wings that wrapped around her body spoke out a conjecture that was nearly conviction as though spitting out, to that surely it was just auditory hallucination, but the words of the irregular that said "Correct" echoed in her ear with teasing tone.



Yes, the role of the mirror bits were to reflect the sunlight convergence laser of Burst Hyperion which was their mother machine. With that, they exterminated the enemy from every direction. The countless bits were constantly changing position and further reflected the reflected lasers, creating a cage of laser that covered the sky and realized a diversified random shooting that was hard to predict due to the irregularity.



By the way, the bits had the word 'mirror' attached to their name, but they weren't reflecting the laser using mirror but by making use of space distortion. Using that it was also possible to bend the laser in sharp angles. In a glance, it looked nothing more than a reflection, hence the naming.



"Well, that'll take care of that."



Due to the omni-directional laser attack without pause, the apostles reflexively deployed defense of silver wings and their charge slowed down, seeing that Hajime snorted while murmuring that.



And then, through the 'distant viewing stone' Hajime sent a fearless grin at the apostles whose expressions were somewhat visibly distorting hatefully. He then operated the jewel and dropped something shining the size of a fist from Burst Hyperion.



Like a morning dew that dripped down from a leaf, the seven shining tears were dropped right in the middle of great number of apostles who currently were beginning to move in the attempt to break through the cage of laser with their silver wings deployed in defense.



"Disappear all at once."



Right at that moment when Hajime whispered in small voice,



*DOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOON-!!!!*



Flowers of sun bloomed at the reddish black sky.



――Treasure Warehouse to exclusively store converged sunlight Rose Helios



What Hajime dropped were special treasure warehouses that stored sunlight which was focused until the limit. It was different with the treasure warehouse that was built internally to shot lasers, so to speak it was a large scale heat bomb that made use of the suns energy by self-destructing to release all the stored energy at once.



This artifact was a treasure where one Burst Hyperion could only have one of it loaded in them, but its power was guaranteed. The heat that was continuously converged was liberated and caused a large explosion like sun flare, the reddish black sky was painted like it was afternoon.



The radiance that made one thought that seven suns were appearing at the same time covered the sky, immediately after that, tremendously powerful shockwave and heat wave poured down.



With this, not only the apostles who aimed to destroy the Burst Hyperion, other apostles who were following behind and the apostles who just came out from the crack in the space were also blown away altogether like leaves. Not only that, but the enormous dust cloud which was approaching the fortress due to the God Mountain's collapse was also washed back.



Naturally that force also assaulted the fortress, but the force was barely blocked by the shining membrane that covered the whole fortress. It was thanks to the 'Great Barrier' that was relocated from the capital to here. The former great barrier would surely be unable to endure the annihilation grade artifact of Hajime, but the current great barrier that had been improved seemed to be able to endure if it was just the shockwave.



The Rose Helios that displayed sublime destruction which surpassed expectation actually made Hajime who was the creator himself to be the one who was sweating coldly the most but… the result was no harm reached his ally so it was alright.



"Uhaa, is has become something amazing isn't iit~"



"Hajime-kun who completely stopped restraining himself change even the topography isn't he…"



"… If an example is made with earth terminology, then it's like Everest got annihilated and nuclear bombs are fired wildly. When the fight is over, we have to make him have restraint with all of our strength."



"… Either way, Shizushizu is going to have hardships. Suzu will also cooperate as much as possible okay. It feels like Suzu can hear the crying of earth from here."



"This world is already teary eyed… When I reach the other side, I'm gonna punch Kouki flying right away. If I don't fight him first… if Kouki get into a fight with Nagumo, not even a dust will remain from him."



Shia and the others leaked out their impression. All of them threw their gaze at the beyond and their lips were half-smiling. They knew that Hajime planned to launch preemptive attacks at the start of the battle, they also knew that he would do that by using 'meteor impact' and 'converged sunlight laser', but never even in their wildest dream did they even imagined that the eight kilometer mountain would be annihilated and pseudo suns would materialize in the sky in multiple numbers even if only temporarily.



Furthermore, behind such Shia and the others…



"How's that, Jii-sama! That is my honored spouse! Isn't it amazing!"



"… aah, yep, I guess. That's really super awesome."



"Cl, Clan head. I understand your feeling, but your speech is… no, nothing, please pay it no heed."



Tio puffed up her chest proudly while Adol was opening his eyes wide looking like the shocked expression that came out in a shoujo manga of a long time ago. A close aide made a tsukkomi at the clan head's discomposed tone, but it seemed that he gave up in the middle. Ristas was extremely surprised that he was unable to stand up with his soul coming out from his mouth. (TN: Shoujo manga is a manga for girl)



Below the fortress was also noisy. Especially the rabbit ear group, they were making a hectic uproar.



"Hyahha-!! As expected bosss! He does impossible things so calmly!"



"Come on you trash! We are gonna break all of you into pieces yeah!!" "Aaaaaan, bosss! Please hold meeeeeee! It's unbearableee!"



"Red Flash Rondo!! Banzai!!" (TN: Akaki Senkyou no Rinbukyoku)



"Mad Whirlwind of White Fang!! Yiihaaa!!" (TN: Shiroki Souga no Kyouhyou)



"No, the nickname until now is not enough anymore! … Something, something that is more worthy for boss…"



"How about Demon King of White Night that Bring About Demise!" (TN: Shuuen Motarasu Byakuya no Maou)



"No, about that Ultimate Supreme Emperor of Death and Chaos is better!" (TN: Shi to Konton no Kyokuhatei)



"Why there is no crimson in there! It's Ultimate Destruction God of Deep Crimson Gleaming Sky!" (TN: Shinku Kouten no Kyokuhashin)



It seemed that when the battle was over Hajime nicknames would become jumbled all over.



Amidst such resounding yells, Aiko yelled with a voice that sounded somewhat cramped yet still powerful.



"Thi, this is, the strength of my sword! Victory is together with us!"



" " " " " " " " " " VICTORY! VICTORY! VICTORY! " " " " " " " " " "



Following that, Gahard somehow pulled himself together and took command with a faint smile. His loud voice resounded all over to the degree that made one think whether he really needed any artifact to amplify his voice.



"All hands, ready your weapon!! The target is above! Don't let the goddess's sword take all the glory! Exactly as the goddess said, every single one of us is a hero! Fight until the last moment! Destroy every single enemy! Proove the strength of us 'humans'!"



" " " " " " " " " "OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO-!!!" " " " " " " " " "



A tremendous yell was raised. At the same time, the soldiers aimed the heavy arms they were provided with each of their roles to the sky. Their morale was at the highest peak. There was nobody who was trembling in fear anymore; in exchange, their body was trembling with a warrior excitement.



Teeth were clenched tightly, light of determination shined inside those eyes.



At the sky, the apostles who barely avoided destruction arranged their formation, and then new apostles were overflowing further from the chasm in the space. Several hundred apostles were supposedly annihilated by the previous attack, but perhaps the apostle of god was in inexhaustible supply.



Therefore, exactly because of that from now on would be the authentic war between mankind and the pawn of god.



Looking at the state of the allied force, Aiko released a sigh that couldn't be noticed.



"Sensei, that was a splendid speech. As expected from the goddess of harvest."



"Nagumo-kun… I already, don't understand what I should say."



Aiko looked over her shoulder at the voice behind her while floating an exasperated smile. While shrugging to that, Hajime handed over the jewel to operate Burst Hyperion to Aiko.



It was the important jewel which brought about that large-scale destruction. Aiko accepted it timidly. From now on Burst Hyperion would be operated by Aiko's hand as much as possible. The one who was the worthiest to handle the sunlight was exactly the 'Goddess of Harvest'.



After glancing at Aiko who was trembling with fear, Hajime turned his gaze at Kaori.



"Your face is an apostle, but the color of your hair looks like Kaori huh. Yeah, as expected, black hair suited Kaori more."



"Ehehe, is that so? Then we have to finish this quickly so I can return to my former body."



Exactly as Hajime said, the current Kaori wasn't silver haired but she became black haired even with Nointo's body.



This was so that she wasn't mistaken with the apostles, the cause was the disguise artifact that Hajime prepared. The color of her magic power was also disguised, so currently when Kaori spread her wings what appeared would black silver wings. Her outfit also had black tone, so her appearance was just like a fallen angel. Perhaps it could be said to be a fitting look for an angel serving the demon king.



"I'm relying on you for the rest okay?"



"Yep. This side is fine. I will protect the place for Hajime-kun to come back here. I also won't let anyone to lay their hand on Myuu-chan and others anymore. That's why… please, save Yue."



"Yeah. Look forward to it. When we come back, I'll toy with you together with Yue."



"Geez-, Hajime-kun you meanie-!"



Kaori made an angry look at Hajime who was making fun of her. But, her gaze was strong, and also extraordinarily gentle. And it was also similar with Hajime, both of them understood well the immenseness of the trust that they directed at each other.



Behind Hajime, Shia, Tio, Shizuku, Suzu, and Ryuutaro walked closer. While Kaori and Shizuku took each other's hands with somewhat yuri-yuri atmosphere (TN: Lilies on their background), Hajime's gaze moved to the surroundings.



The people inside the fortress could observe the outer part really well while being inside the fortress itself due to the countless crystal displays installed. But right now, on the contrary, the displays were reflecting the interior of the fortress's command room and the people inside there like Liliana and the others, and then Kam and others who were the leaders of each force too.



"Princess. Use the anti-apostle artifact well okay. After all, I entrusted them believing in your competence you know?"



{Ple, please don't put pressure on me. Well, we are going to make it somehow. Nagumo-sa――no, Hajime-san, may luck be with you.}



Liliana at the other side of the display smiled while nodding at Hajime. Hajime nodded to that and then moved his gaze to Kam who was projected on the same display.



"Kam. There is no need for tedious talk after this far. … Go rampage."



{Ku-ku-ku-, an exciting order, thank you very much. I certainly acknowledge that. All of us Haulia will be waiting in anticipation for boss's god killing.}



Hajime and Kam exchanged fearless smiles at each other. And then, Hajime's gaze further moved to all the people who were visible in that place――Ranzi, Alfrerick, Iruwa, the top leaders from each country, then he lightly shrugged and declared.



"Then, I'll go for a bit."



Even though he was going to step into the territory of a god after this, those words were awfully light. But, mysterious strength could be felt from those words. It made them unconditionally believed, that if it was this man then he would be able to accomplish anything. It was that kind of words.



That was why nobody talked much. They nodded strongly in return and said just two words.



" " "See you." " "



Immediately after, Hajime and the others flew up together.



Under their feet were skyboards. They could also go using 'Air Force', but their destination――the chasm in space was at the altitude of eight kilometers. They had no intention to be pushed back by sheer number or spending more time. They were breaking through in one go stressing on the speed!



Looking at the six streaks of magic power light in six colors ascending to the sky, cheers were raised from the allied force. It was the sally of the 'Goddess's Sword". The hope of humanity! Like that, yells of hope tore their throats toward the sky.



There, the first wave of apostles appeared as though to block their route. Perhaps because right after the invasion start the actual first wave had been annihilated by impossible methods, the apostles didn't charge ahead recklessly. It was clear that they intended to fight while observing the situation.



"Hah, you all got really jittery, huuh. You think you can stop me with that kind of cold feet aa!?"



Already, there were around twenty apostles gathering ahead of them, regardless of the twin swords and their silver wings which were deployed fully, Hajime didn't slow down at all. Far from that, he accelerated the skyboard further. And then, while telling Shia and others to ready their weapons using 'Telepathy', Hajime took out a huge artifact from 'Treasure Warehouse II' and shouldered it.



"I'll turn you all into Swiss cheese!"



Immediately after, a crimson storm attacked the apostles.



The violence that could only be expressed like that pulverized the apostles blocking the path like a joke.



Of course, the apostles possessed disintegration ability, they had the silver wings of protection and huge swords that severed all thing with disintegration. Therefore, the apostles wordlessly and expressionlessly tried to resist using those. But, such things were easily smashed literally just like paper scraps.



*KIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII-!!*



Huge gun barrels that rotated in high speed while resounding particular sound. Brilliantly vivid magic power light sparked wildly. Extremely thick crimson flashes that might even pierce the sky surged.



――Gatling Pile Bunker



That was the true form of the weapon that scattered twenty apostles without difficulty. Different from the pile bunker until now, the loaded pile bunker was two sizes smaller. But, its might didn't decrease for even a bit, in a second twenty electromagnetically accelerated shots spiraled forward and the huge and super heavy black pike pulverized the target.



Right now, just by facing each other the apostles couldn't hope to stop Hajime's advance! Only by wringing out their intellect, piling up study, and resolve with a firm will like humans, they would be allowed to finally stand in front of this opponent for the first time. That was how wide the difference was!



The apostles who stiffened for a moment in amazement then decided, a pincer attack from left and right! Like that they circled while trailing afterimages behind.



"We cannot leave this only to Hajime-san!"



"Indeed!"



Shia and Tio readied themselves to deal with that.



But two apostles that brandished their large sword clad in silver magic power toward Shia and Tio. At the next moment, their heads were blown away by the flash that tore the sky before they were falling down spinning.



"Fue?"



"Wha, what?"



Shia and Tio stared in puzzlement with their spirit dampened. Not only the two, Hajime and the others also looked over their shoulder following the line of the flash. They had already reached the altitude of five kilometers so nobody understood other than Shia whose body was reinforced and Hajime who possessed 'Far Sight', those two perfectly saw it.



The fortress on the ground, at a corner of the rooftop, while holding a very long sniper that was fixed directly on the floor of the fortress, Pal-kun (ten years old), nickname 'Bardfelt of Certain Ruin' was sending them a thumbs up.



Not just Bardfelt-kun. The sniping experts even among the Haulia which was put together into a squad were readying the 'Electromagnetic Acceleration Super Long Range Anti-Material Rifle' that Hajime provided for each one of them while floating fearless smiles.



In the first place, these were the fellows who performed super accurate sniping even with just a crossbow. With scope that was enchanted with 'Far Sight' and 'Foresight', if they could see the future position of the apostles then a five-kilometer sniping was possible. Though honestly, Hajime was feeling a little unbelieving.



In Hajime and Shia's eyes, they could see the glint of Bardfelt-kun's eyes narrow across the scope. At the same time, they could somehow see what he was saying from the movement of his lips.



{Boss! Anego! Just leave clearing the path to us!} (TN: Anego=big sister, this way of calling usually used by delinquent or thug.)



Perhaps that was what he said. As though to proof that, the apostles who planned to pincer attack were shot through one after another by the flashes soaring from below.



As expected, one shot one kill was impossible after the apostle became on guard, but even so they ate considerable damage, they became unable to attack carelessly and somehow their face looked vexed.



Even if the apostles tried to use long range bombarding or large scale magic, Bardfelt-kun and others sensitively sensed it and they prioritized sniping at the apostle trying to do that. Their attack was interrupted, and even if they tried to attack forcefully regardless, Hajime and others would easily endure such attack.



"My clan is rapidly getting superhumanized desuu…"



"Perhaps, it's not only Shia anymore that can be called as special truly."



"Everyone that got involved with Hajime all become distanced from normal humans, isn't it…"



"He, hey, Shizushizu. Suzu is still a human, right? Right?"



"Perhaps it's already too late for me yeah~"



While riding their skyboard, the enemy at the front was dealt by Hajime's Gatling pile bunker, while the enemy to the left and right were dealt with a terrifying degree of accurate sniping, so Shia and the others who only needed to intercept, evade, and defend minimally had time to have somewhat distant looks while murmuring that kind of thing to each other.



While the apostles were unable to even hinder them properly; finally, Hajime and the others arrived at the chasm in space that spurted out the muddy black miasma.



"Chih, even though its appearance changed, the ability is still the same huh."



Hajime clicked his tongue. Exactly as he said, similar with the golden whirl, the black miasma was blocking Hajime and the others' progress.



"You guys, hold back the puppets behind! {Sensei, you can hear right? Send the mirror bits over here!}. Taniguchi, you put a barrier on me!"



{Ro, roger.}



"Go, got it."



Hajime was giving out instruction to Aiko on the surface and Suzu, and also at the other members while taking out a short sword from his breast pocket.



Although the item had the shape of a short sword but it didn't have any edge at all, rather it was made from a crystal that looked brittle.



It was 'Degraded Version Crystal Key'. Based on his experience when creating the real crystal key, Hajime produced with his all this short sword that possessed the effect to interfere with space. It didn't have the power to open a gate toward the Holy Precincts, but if it was just the power to lockpick a locked door then this item could do it.



Hajime's body became clad in vivid crimson. And then he poured the immense magic power of 'Limit Break' into the degraded version crystal key that used the very small amount of god crystal's fragment discovered at the abyss of Orcus, activating its ability.



"This time for sure, I'll pass through no matter what!"



Hajime yelled and stabbed that short sword at the miasma wall.



*Creak, creak* Such a sound came out, the degraded crystal key in trying to break the wall of miasma causing ripples. Hajime's crimson magic power also roared trying to blow away the miasma.



But, there a silver shining large sword thrust out from inside the miasma. The large sword of apostle.



Even while Hajime held his ground to break the miasma, naturally the swarm of apostles was still coming out from there. Hajime himself was pouring all his strength to break the miasma so he couldn't take any considerable action.



{I won't let you!!}



"Don't get in the way!"



That was why Aiko and Suzu were there.



The mirror bits deployed around Hajime and others were guiding the laser from Burst Hyperion and blocked the approach of the apostles like a barrier.



And then Suzu also waved her iron fans gently on her skyboard. Living up to her reputation of barrier master, a square shining shield thirty-centimeters large was invoked instantly, the barrier didn't block the large sword of the apostle that slipped through the laser net, but diverted the trajectory as though the barrier surface was slippery. This was because Suzu understood that defending the enemy's disintegration ability from the front was disadvantageous.



Behind Hajime, Shia and others were also buying time by putting importance on handling the enemy rather than defeating them. Apostles were overflowing from the miasma as though they were unlimited, if the scene was seen from slightly distant spot, surely it would look like Hajime and the others were enveloped in silver cocoon.



The great numbers of apostles attacked clad in silver magic power to remove the insolent people who were trying to step into the Holy Precincts. Shia and the other somehow held out right now, but with the current pace they would surely get swallowed by pure numbers in less than a minute.



For that reason, Hajime ignored all the attacks of the apostles. He entrusted his back, his life, everything to Shia and the others. He turned his whole mind only to advance forward.



"OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO-!!!"



A shout burst from Hajime's mouth. Hajime's magic power further increased. The degraded version crystal key condensed the vivid crimson and got dyed with deep crimson. At the same time, cracks ran creakingly as though the key was screaming unable to endure the large power.



The cracks on the degraded version crystal key was widening second by second as though giving the notification that its life span was up already. But, Hajime further poured his magic power. The apostles who were breaking through even with half their body erased by laser launched silver feathers that disintegrated even Suzu's barrier, cutting Hajime's cheek and gouging his limbs.



Shia and the others were also bearing wounds from the overwhelming amount of attacks and their limited battle scope.



As expected, were they really unable to break through. Was the power of god unmatched…



If the people here were 'average', surely such thinking would pass in their mind. But, if they were people with such good understanding, then in the first place they wouldn't be here. That was why, they yelled. Even while injured, even with enemies surrounding them from all sides.



(En: Battle scene pictured above)



"We can do this! If it's Hajime-san!"



"Exactly, Goshujin-sama!"



"It's fine! There is no such thing that can possibly stop you!"



"Gooo! Nagumo-kun!"



"Nagumooo! Smash it uuup!"



To those yells of Shia and others, Hajime was…



"Obviously-. Those guys that got in my way, I'll destroy them, anything and everythiiiiiiing!!"



Right after that…



*creak* A sound resounded.



But, that wasn't the sound of the degraded crystal key. It was from the invisible wall before his eyes, from the crack in space that spurted out miasma. The tip of the degraded crystal key plunged into the wall. With that spot as the center, ripples were spreading.



――Yue-



Following his desiring heart, Hajime twisted the crystal short sword.



Then, with the stabbed point as the center, space distorted flabbily, opening an ellipse hole.



The path to the Holy Precincts was opened.



"-, you guys! Here we go!"



"Yes desu!"



"Yes!"



"Roger!"



"Yep!"



"Ou-!"



The command that was given along with Hajime's fearless smile was affirmed by everyone with the same smile floating on their faces and a nod.



Right after that, the swarm of apostles descended on them.



But, the figure of Hajime and the others were already gone from between the apostles.



After that, there were only the sparkles emitted by the remain of the broken degraded crystal key and the gate that was closing even now.



_______________________________________________



Soooo… giant hole in the sky. Disposable look-alike CGI army. Battle through the streets of a city. A team of assembled superpowered heros. Sounds like a Hollywood Blockbuster to me.





Chapter 164




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert is pushing to release faster, so he has taken over all editing. I don’t have the time in my schedule to keep up, so my involvement for the moment is to just post bakapervert’s chapters. No read over from me, no schedule. I’ll release them as I get them until the end. On the upside, you won’t be waiting long for the finale.



__________________________________________________



Holy Precincts



A world that was richly colored.



That was the scenery that lept into the eyes of Hajime and the others who stepped in into the Holy Precincts.



There was no end that could be confirmed. Various colors mixed in this space. It was as though they were lost inside a world within a bubble.



In that mysteriously colorful space, there was a chalk white path stretching straight forward. No, rather than calling it a path, it was like the top of a dam wall, it was more correct to express their location as 'above a huge straight wall'.



Hajime and the others were taken aback for a moment. Despite so, they stored the skyboard that became ragged from the apostles' attack into 'Treasure Warehouse II' and stood on the chalk white path. They couldn't see any apostles even after looking around. It appeared the space that Hajime connected to using the degraded crystal key was a different place from the place that contained the apostles and monsters. They had resolved to clash with a great amount of apostles and monsters as far as their eye could see right after infiltrating, so this could be said as fortunate.



"What a mysterious space. I cannot grasp the sense of distance."



Shia gave her impression while peeking down from the edge of the path. Just as those words sounded, even as she peeked below, the ground or the bottom of the wall were unclearly being swallowed by the extremely colorful space. Even the path straight ahead, after a certain distance, became swallowed by the colorful space that made it hard to confirm the distance.



"I guess it won't end well if you fall down huh. Everyone, be careful okay."



Everyone nodded briskly at Hajime's warning. Like that they all began to run following after Hajime while staying vigilant of the surrounding.



They were traveling at high speed following the chalk white path in the atmosphere that was filled with uneasy silence. The 'Compass of Guidance' showed that Yue's whereabouts was ahead of the chalk white path. Therefore they dashed believing on that, although there was not a single thing they could use to confirm the distance so they became doubtful whether they were really advancing forward.



If not for the compass that was teaching Hajime that the distance to Yue was closing even for just a little, perhaps even he would also feel doubt.



They advanced the path for several dozen minutes where no end could be seen with few words.



Finally, a change happened.



"It's coming-. Bombardment!"



Shia's rabbit ears stood up straight all of a sudden, at the same time she gave a warning. Regardless of their vigilance, everyone other than Shia was completely taken by surprise. It was the proof that Shia's 'Future Sight' was activated, at the same time it also meant that the attack was a risky one that could possibly wipe them out.



Right after that, without any advance warning, silver radiant flashes attacked Hajime and the others from all directions. It was a meteor shower of death without a single gap, conveying clearly how no place of escape was left behind.



"Gather!"



Hajime's angry roar flew. Everyone reflexively approached Hajime's side. At the same time, Hajime took out a huge shield from 'Treasure Warehouse II'. And then that shield which was manifested in empty air pierced the ground while magic power was poured into it.



As the result, *Gashun! Gashun!* such sound was raised, metal plates were sliding from the inside of the large shield in great speed. In the blink of eye the plates formed a dome that covered Hajime and the others. Metal plates that looked like scales stretched, it was variable large shield 'Aidion'.



The moment the last metal plate slid into place and Hajime and co were completely covered, the flashes from all directions finally arrived. There was almost no impact. The attack was like a laser, the surface of Aidion was turning into dust. Obviously, the cause was the disintegration ability of the apostles.



But such thing was obvious the moment there was silver light. For that reason, Hajime chose the option of omni-direction defense with this Aidion.



"Hah, just try it if you think you can penetrate this."



Hajime whispered while smiling fearlessly inside Aidion where there was the illumination of green light stone installed. That was the expression of his confidence. An absolute confidence that the likes of the apostle wouldn't be able to penetrate his improved defense.



In front of the brutal characteristic ability of the apostles which was like a foul play, those words were something too insolent.



Normally.



Yes, even while Hajime was spouting out those insolent words, Aidion was completely blocking the disintegration bombardment. No, more accurately the shield's part that was disintegrated was regenerating. It went without saying that the cause was regeneration magic. 'Restoration Stone' that was enchanted with regeneration magic was continuously regenerating the part of Aidion that was turned to dust as though time was rolled back.



Of course, the disintegration ability of the apostles was at the level where a building would become dust in an instant, so no matter how much regeneration magic was enchanted the outcome would be that the item got blown away before it could show any effect.



However, this Aidion was similar with 'Sky Severance' where it was a composite shield made of several layers of adamantium inserted with restoration stone, furthermore, Hajime's 'Vajra' was also reinforcing it. In other words, even with one layer disintegrated, if the second, third, and fourth layer could buy time even for a second then the restoration stone could display its effect. Therefore, even with that disintegration ability, the apostles couldn't hope to penetrate it.



"You guys, save your strength for the time being. If it's just this many apostles then I'll deal with them."



"Eh? Deal with them…"



Shizuku was putting strength into the hand holding the black katana in the preparation of battle against apostle swarm once more, but Hajime's words resounded as though to dampen her spirit. Shizuku reflexively asked back, but inside the large shield that was illuminated faintly by green light stone, looking at Hajime's expression that supported the large shield――that look which looked like a wild beast made her words got caught up in her throat.



Right after that, the pressure that pushed on Aidion suddenly vanished. The all-out bombardment of the apostles was over.



Hajime transferred Aidion into 'Treasure Warehouse II', right after that the apostles showed their figure as though they were oozing out from the colorful space while making ripples. All of the apostles were clad in silver magic power, showing their seriousness right from the beginning. They sent narrowed gaze at Hajime who endured their all-out bombardment, in an instant…



――A curb stomp began.



*DOPAAAAAAN-*, at the same time when the familiar bursting sound roared, six apostles' head easily exploded like a joke.



"-!?"



It was a swift defeat unbecoming for god's apostle.



The apostles who lost six of their sister right at the moment when they made their entrance gulped audibly. The crimson flash that gouged the apostles' head certainly attacked faster than the gun sound, but it should be possible to evade if it was the apostle in full power state clad in silver light.



The cause that negated the apostles' evasion ability could be understood from the fact that all the six victims were all the people who blinked in that instant.



Hajime was taking the opening of the apostles' mind. The number of the apostles who appeared from the space was nearly fifty people. Hajime confirmed all of them instantly and aimed simultaneously only at the blinking apostles with pinpoint precision…



Hajime had survived many battles against the apostles, that was the reason this special move with difficulty level that was like threading the eye of a needle was working. There was no way the apostles could understand what happened.



Because of that, they were unable to understand the reason why their sisters were shot without being unable to do anything, this too caused their head to be soaked in confusion for an instant.



*DOPAAAN*



With that four more people died. Their head exploded and fell on the ground like an insect with their wings clipped.



"Kuh, three people are to chant-. The rest continue on!"



One of the apostles gave out instruction while grinding her teeth with the usual expressionless face crumbling. It appeared that she was the manager who handed down the command even among the apostles. The remaining apostles obeyed the instruction and moved all at once.



The apostle that gave instruction――Zekst swung her twin large swords once and then took flight instantly with her silver wings flapped. She charged at Hajime while leaving behind afterimages.



But, to such apostle, the small murmur of Hajime reached her clearly.



"…Hee, so you are the captain."



"――"



Amidst a large number of apostles flying around with countless afterimages filling the space to the limit, Hajime's eye glint accurately caught Zekst's figure.



And then, Hajime and Zekst's gaze entangled inside the world where the rich colors looked fading and dull, right after that, slowly, and even slower inside Zekst's mind, Hajime's mouth…split.



At that moment, Zekst realized. This world where the flow of time became slow right now, wasn't something produced because of her great speed, but it was the phenomenon of revolving lantern that someone watched at their dying moments. The reason of her realization was because, even while she was getting aware of the slowly approaching bullet clad in crimson toward her in the real world, the images of the many secret maneuverings 'the apostle of god' had carried out until now in all countries toward the people were also passing through her mind.



All apostles shared their memory with each other. Even if it wasn't something that Zekst personally did, but something that 'apostle' did was something that Zekst did. …Zekst thought. Were the apostles who were destroyed before she also saw the same scene like this? The scene, of the people who they had been toying with until now, were now looking down at them mockingly.



Zekst's body was accurately moving even while watching the revolving lantern. Her neck moved by itself trying to evade the flying bullet by twisting aside. But, mysteriously even with that Zekst was convinced that the approaching bullet would still pierce her.



And then, that conviction was proved right within an instant. The moment Zekst twisted her neck, of all thing, the bullet before her eyes shifted its trajectory slightly. Its path was accurately heading to Zekst's temple.



'Aa, really, what an irregular…'



After murmuring such thing inside her heart, in the end Zekst felt an impact, along with that her consciousness fell into darkness.



At the same time when Zekst fell, further seven apostles also fell on the ground with their head similarly blown away.



Hajime glanced at that scene while rotating Donner & Schlag in gun spin, then he scattered more bullets of death to all directions.



Although because Hajime's arms rotation and the reloading speed were too fast, an outsider looking would only be able to see acrobatic gun spins repeating all the time. The realization of Hajime's killing intent was displayed only by the fact that the scattered crimson flashes were shooting through the foreheads of the apostles without the slightest deviation.



"Wh, why-"



Unable to endure, one of the apostles who wasn't shot down yet spoke with rough voice and words that could be taken as a question or escaping reality.



It was natural for her to be like that. They were the 'apostle of god'. The sword of god that the likes of mankind had no hope to oppose. They were an existence that could trample the world equally like a natural disaster with just a single one of them! And yet, why, how they could be easily exterminated like this, dropping out just like flies…. Impossible. There was no way this kind of unrealistic sight could exist!



Right after that, a flash flew toward that apostle.



With an unknown emotion welling up inside her, that apostle drew a slash at the air trying to bisect that light with her shining large sword. The information that Hajime's bullet which generated impact could crack their large sword with one attack in the previous battle was naturally also shared with this apostle, therefore she decided not to 'make her large sword into shield' but to 'cut down the bullet'.



Like that, the beautiful silver trajectory split the crimson flash…was how it should be.



Instead, the result that came out was the explosion of the apostle's head. Just before the apostle's mind sunk into darkness, she whispered inside her stretched out perception.



'The light…slip through?……'



It wasn't unreasonable for her to have that misapprehension.



――Combined Metamorphosis-Creation Transmutation Special Bullet Living Bullet



That was the true form of the attack that slipped through the apostles' evasion and large swords.



This 'Living Bullet' was a special bullet enchanted with metamorphosis magic, the simple explanation was that the bullet could listen to the command of the user――it was literally a living bullet.



Hajime developed this bullet after understanding that the sealing stone and the pseudo scorpion in the abyss were created by blending organic matter and inorganic matter, so simply put the bullet was a living golem in bullet shape that executed a simple order.



This time the command that Hajime gave was just one. 'Hit the aimed place', that was all. It was a small bullet, so even though they listened to order but they had no ego. So to speak it was like a program. Evade if there was an obstacle in front of the target, chase if the target moved. That was all they could do. The bullet couldn't make U-turn if they passed the target and chased endlessly, it was also unable to circle around if a wall was made with silver wings to shot the apostle at the back of their head.



But, even so, the electromagnetically accelerated flash that reached the target within an instant corrected its trajectory just a few meters before it reached the target. No matter how unfair the perception ability and reaction speed the apostle had, there was no way they could evade or anything.



If the apostle tried to cut the bullet using their large sword but the bullet changed trajectory smoothly, it wasn't unreasonable for the apostle to mistake that the bullet 'slipped through'.



"Before, you guys said this right. That 'the analysis about you is finished'. Just what time are you talking about I wonder. By the time you failed to kill me for the second time, the scythe of death god has already lined up on the neck of you guys."



The gun spin moved at too high of rotation speed that it looked like a round shield. Hajime's figure that moved with sliding feet turning over and over while firing flashes in radial direction looked like he was dancing.



And then as long as that dance of death was continuing, one by one the apostles had their forehead pierced, their head exploded, and fell like a puppet with their string cut.



If they tried using their large sword as a shield, then an attack with three impacts compressed into it would assault and with just a single shot, a fatal damage would be inflicted on the large sword, in a hairbreadth the second shot would pierce the forehead altogether with the sword. Even when they tried long range attack or magic, their breathing at the instant they were going to attack was perfectly read, so they were only exposing their opening instead, but if they attempted close range combat then they would be intercepted by a bullet with bending trajectory.



When they attempted to overlap their twin large swords and silver wings as a shield to charge through, six shots would burst with pin point accuracy at the same time, the tremendous shockwave was generated while smashing the iron wall, or possibly the apostle would run out of strength and got blown away. And then, that impact would spontaneously make them relaxed the guard of their large sword and wing, the curving bullet would attack weaving through that opening.



"While I was thinking of the ways to kill you guys, what were you guys doing? Did you analyze my fighting style? Hah, that won't cut it at all. You got to train yourself, change your weapon, polish your tactic, heighten your proficiency, put double and triple layer of traps, and mass produce trump cards."



The apostles' worn-out remain vanished from the sky toward the ground like a cookie's crumbling that spilled from a mouth.



"Shut up-"



Right after that, along with an angry voice that sounded like it was desperately repressing something that welled up inside the speaker, a silver sun materialized. The sun that brilliantly shined was something made from focused magic power of apostle enchanted with disintegration ability. Looking closer, under the silver sun there were three apostles raising their large sword piled into one. Most likely this was a large bombardment executed by multiple apostles.



Looking at that, Hajime was…snorting in exasperation.



"Is that your trump card! Fine, bring it on."



"-…Vanish without any trace behind! Irregular!"



The three apostles swung down their sword in unison. The silver sun that was a compression of energy until the critical state radiated its light of ruin just like prominence. A super thick laser with diameter reaching ten meters approached Hajime in order to make everything of him into dust.



From 'Treasure Warehouse II', Hajime too out two pieces of disk――he took out two chakrams and threw them forward. One of the chakrams rotated in the air, when its flat part faced the approaching thick bombardment, at the next moment it divided into three parts.



The chakram was divided into three parts with equal distance between them, however, they didn't scatter into pieces, the parts were connected by thin wire, the parts spread widely in an instant and created large circle before Hajime's eyes.



At that moment, the silver huge laser reached Hajime…not, it was completely swallowed into the circle made by the divided chakram and the wire. And then, that swallowed silver light jumped out from the other chakram that also parted and created a similar large circle at a slightly separated place.



――Variable Chakram Orestes



The chakram up to now could only create a gate at the small inside of the chakram, but this new type chakram 'Orestes' that had improvement applied in it could separate and with the built-in wire inside, a gate that could be freely changed in size would be made. Depending on the situation, it could also be used as a guillotine by making something passed halfway into the gate and then decreasing the size.



The apostles never even dreamed that the focused bombardment by three apostles which could be said as a trump card would be returned back to them as it was, perhaps they were unable to move while performing the firing, their reaction was dull and they got swallowed into the light that they fired themselves, they were annihilated literally without leaving even dust behind.



"You guys don't evolve. You cannot struggle to the death for the sake of living, for the sake of your wish, for the sake of what's 'important'. That's why, I told you right from the beginning didn't I? You all just wooden doll."



"Irregular! No, you are truly, a true monste――"



A gunshot echoed. The bullet that curved in trajectory approached easily like a joke and pierced the forehead of the last apostle.



While silver feathers and apostle remains were falling like an illusion, Hajime spun the smoking Donner & Schlag and finished reloading, then he silently stored them in their holsters.



Looking at the result, he was uninjured from a fight against the fifty apostles of god. Completely. It was truly overwhelming.



That fact made Shia, Tio, and Shizuku's expression to turn a bit into ecstasy. Suzu and Ryutaro leaked out a dry laugh.



'Meteor Impact' that destroyed the God Mountain, sunlight convergence laser 'Burst Hyperion', gatling pile bunker and living bullet…when Hajime was given time, that many absurd weapons were produced one after another.



What did it mean by a non-combat job. What did it mean by mundane occupation. Indeed Hajime's body itself boasted monstrous spec due to an irregular event, but Hajime's true weapon was no other than that power of development. And then, in every age what became a threat to humanity was always 'something' that was newly created. In a sense, perhaps it could be said that Hajime was in possession of the most terrifying talent.



While it had been too late at this point of time, whether they wanted it or not Shizuku and the others were made to understand that.



"It's going to be troublesome if they come in succession. Let's go ahead right away."



Hearing Hajime who started running while giving out the order as though nothing happened, Shizuku and the others came back to their senses and chased behind him.



"Aaa. I wanted to show Hajime-san just now to Yue-san desuuu"



"Fufu, I thought that there might be this kind of thing. So I bring the image recording artifact. When everything is over, let art we hold a video appreciation meeting!"



"Tio-san, nice desu! As expected from the extraordinary pervert that might even leave her name in the history!"



"Fuhahaha, don't praise me, don't praise me! I would become shy thou know?"



Shia and Tio laughed with each other in composure while being inside the enemy base that was the Holy Precincts. Their feeling was loosening up with that while they dashed forward for a while.



Hajime and the others finally ran into a richly colored wall. When his hand touched the rippling wall, the hand easily sunk into the other side. They nodded at each other and the whole group leaped into the other side of the ripple.



If Nakamura Eri was asked what was her first memory that was the most intense, surely she would answer like this.



――The scene of Otou-san's death.



It was when Eri was five years old. She went with her father to a public park with just the two of them, there the high-spirited Eri jumped on the roadway carelessly and with a devilish timing a car came charging forward, then her father died protecting Eri. In a sense, it was the result of a mundane traffic accident.



But, there was one result that wasn't mundane. That was the state of her mother after that. Eri's mother was a daughter from a slightly high-class family, but it seemed that she went against her family and married with Eri's father, she was clinging all over the father to the degree that even Eri's childish heart got embarrassed.



That wasn't only because the mother merely loved the father, if someone took a step back and looked at it closer, perhaps it was on the level that could be said as dependence. For that reason, Eri's mother that from the start wasn't mentally strong was unable to endure the death of the beloved husband that supported her heart.



Because she was unable to endure, she bared her fang to the cause of death. Yes, her target was her own young daughter――Eri. Normally, a mother would swallow her tears while supporting her daughter who should be hurt because she witnessed with her own eyes the death of her father, that would be the correct way of living as a mother. But, as expected, although Eri's mother held back in front of other people, when they returned home and there were only the two of them, she would direct her hatred at Eri without sugarcoating it at all.



For Eri's mother, if her daughter and her husband were weighed on the scales, the scale would tilt to the latter, she loved her daughter was also only because Eri was her husband's daughter.



At the time, the five years old Eri earnestly endured the violence that was carried out almost every day and the abusive language spewed out to her. That was because Eri who was smart for five years old was completely accepting the words of her mother that said "because of your fault" to her. Her carelessness killed her father――the one who believed that more than anyone else was no other than Eri herself.



It was only natural for her mother to be angry at her who stole the father that her mother loved. It was only natural that she who made her father died was given punishment to both her heart and body. Eri believed that from the bottom of her heart.



At the same time, Eri also believed that when this punishment was over, than her mother who looked like a demon would return to the gentle mother in the past who always smiled kindly.



Her mother's abuse was ingenious, she had never done anything that might leave any mark on Eri's body. Eri too had also never revealed anything for the sake of her mother, and also for the sake of the punishment to her. Because of that, such situation continued for a few years, but there was no one that could notice what happened.



However, for a child there was no way she would be able to always be smiling in such environment. As a child clad in gloomy atmosphere Eri practically didn't have any friend at school. Her lone quiet self that looked like someone bracing herself waiting for the storm to pass was surely eerie for the children of the same age.



Isolation and self-condemnation and the pain of her heart, her feeling that was thinking of her mother, and loneliness…Eri's heart was nearing its limit from all those. Like that she endured such situation for several years, but in a sense it also could be said as astounding how she endured that long.



A change happened at such gloomy days.



Nine years old――when she was in third-year elementary school. Her mother brought home an unknown male into their home. He was an adult male with an arrogant attitude and bad character. Her mother was making sickly-sweet coaxing voice at that man while clinging coquettishly all over him.



Eri couldn't believe it. Didn't her mother throw that much anger and hatred to herself exactly because she loved the father from the bottom of her heart, Eri thought.



That thinking wasn't mistaken. But, the heart of Eri's mother was far weaker than even Eri thought. To the degree that if she wasn't supported by someone, then she wouldn't be able to live properly.



From that day, Eri's house was lived by that man.



The way the man acted in the house was exactly like a typical trash that often came out in a cheap novel. And then in addition, as though to follow the clichéd story of such novel, the gaze of that man toward Eri wasn't something that was usually directed to a little girl.



The disgusting feeling that felt like it was crawling all over her body caused Eri to pass her time inside the house holding her breath even more than before. Even so, the act and speech of the man were gradually escalating, before long Eri called herself with 'boku' (TN: This way of calling oneself was usually used by a boy, a girl usually used 'watashi') and she kept her hair in rough short-cut style. That was the meager measure of the small Eri to defend herself from the thinking that 'if he is not seeing me as a girl then'.



At school, Eri who even at normal time was already seen as gloomy and somewhat eerie, one day she suddenly changed the way she called herself and came with short hair like a boy, that caused the few children who even though they weren't her friend but they still conversed daily with Eri, even those children distanced themselves from Eri. Eri became isolated further and further.



Even so, even if she felt that her mother betrayed her father, Eri still believed. That her mother would surely return to the gentle mother in the past. She pretended to not notice that such thinking was only a type of escape that averted her eyes from reality.



That hope of Eri that was like grasping at straw, was destroyed by an event that made her realize that the hope was really just a fragile straw. Finally the man bared his fang of desire at Eri. It was while Eri's mother was going out for her night work.



Fortunately, though it was unclear if it could really be called fortunate, the neighbors who heard Eri's scream notified the police, thanks to that Eri's chastity wasn't scattered. Eri herself was thinking that perhaps this kind of day would come, so she had prepared every day by opening the window so her scream could easily reach, that was also the reason she was saved.



And so being attacked wasn't something shocking for Eri. Rather, she even thought that it was a chance. With this her mother should finally open her eyes. Her mother would cut the connection with a man that attacked her own daughter and she would remember Eri's father. In any case, the man was caught by police, so their connection was severed. With this the livelihood of Eri and her mother would be improved slightly, she thought.



Yes, she thought like that.



Only until her mother directed a hatred that was even more than until now to her.



After finishing with the questioning from the police and she returned together with Eri back to their home, what came flying the very first to Eri was the mother's slap. And then, the mother said this to Eri. "How dare you seduce that person."



It seemed, for her mother, the incident where Eri was attacked by the man wasn't an impetus for her to realize the trashiness of the man, but it was perceived by the mother as Eri stealing her mother's man once more. Rather than about her daughter receiving assault, the matter of how the man was separated from her and how the man's desire was directed at Eri were the matters that the mother couldn't stomach.



A mother that betrayed her father, a mother that hurt her, a mother that was sad because the man was gone rather than about her daughter got assaulted…at this time, Eri finally realized. No, perhaps it should be said that she finally looked straight at something that she had actually understood but she averted her eyes from.



That was, that her mother didn't love her. That her mother of the past wouldn't return anymore. That the real nature of her mother wasn't the gentle figure in the past, but the figure overflowing with ugliness in front of her eyes right now.



She realized those.



That was why――Eri broke.



Everything that she believed was an illusion. Her enduring was meaningless. And then, there was no hope for the future ahead. Those factors were far than enough to break the very young Eri.



When she woke up the next day not from her sleep but rather from her fainting, it was early morning when the sun still hadn't even risen, there Eri slipped out from the home. This wasn't an act of testing affection that children tended to do, to see if her mother would worry and came to search for her. It was for the sake of ending herself――in other words, for suicide.



She got out of the home was because she didn't want to die near her mother for some reason.



Like that, Eri wandered unsteadily without any particular destination, and what she discovered was a river. A large river at a place slightly distanced from home. The well-maintained river plain became a good place for children to play. With this Eri who stared vacantly at the river flowing below from the iron bridge spanning above got a thought, let's do it here.



It was a river with quite the amount of water, but the flow wasn't particularly fast, and it wasn't like the water level rose due to rain. For suicide by drowning, this place could honestly be said as unsuited. Rather than drowning, there was more danger from jumping down from the bridge and landed wrongly. Although even that risk would be lessened by the river water and wouldn't cause death in many cases.



Eri's body somehow climbed up with her thin arms, her upper body jutted out a lot outside the handrail. Like that as though being sucked in, Eri's body was almost falling toward under the bridge…exactly at that time, suddenly a voice called at her.



――What are you doing? The voice said.



What entered into Eri's vacant eyes that looked back was a young boy around the same age of her, he was wearing a jersey and was obviously jogging. Eri also knew well about this boy, he was someone at the same school with her who gathered all the popularity into himself, a shining bright boy――yes, it was Amanogawa Kouki.



Seeing the dark expression of the looking back Eri, Kouki guessed that she wasn't in a normal state of mind, he pulled back Eri forcefully from the handrail and displayed his sense of justice in full.



To Kouki who persistently asked her situation, Eri explained with a lot of things omitted. She did that because if she didn't then it didn't seem like Kouki would let her go. Kouki who listened to the really shortened explanation of Eri then comprehended it like this.



Eri who was isolated in school was disciplined strictly by her father because of that. When she asked for help from her mother, even her mother than scolded her together with her father. Eri didn't have any ally and feeling sad, she tried to suicide.



That conclusion couldn't be said as mistaken from hearing only that fragmentary information. For Kouki who was still immature and fiercely under the impression that human nature was fundamentally good as his thinking foundation, thing like the principle behind the act of Eri's mother was beyond his understanding, he was unable to even imagine that an adult male would make a girl the same age as him into the man's outlet for desire, furthermore, the mother would instead blame her daughter for that. And so, the conclusion became like that within Kouki's sphere of understanding.



Understanding it like that, with a smile and strength that made the girls in school into his captive even in that age, Kouki put his hands on Eri's cheeks while declared from point-blank range.



――You are not alone anymore. I will protect Eri.



He said that. The word 'protect' was told to her, into the heart of a broken girl, right after she comprehended that she was worthless for everyone. It was said so surely without a doubt. From the most famous boy in the school that was like a prince, in a situation that could be said as dramatic in a sense, that kind of thing was said to Eri.



In the bottom of her heart, for the little girl who had been continuously searching for affection from someone all this time, that word was extremely intense.



Furthermore, at that day, Eri who somehow given up suicide was driven out by her mother to go to school, there at the school she was surprised because the girls in the class came to talk to her brightly one after another, furthermore when she knew that this situation was because of a word from Kaori…to say it frankly, her heart fell to him right there.



After that, the staffs of child consultation center suspected mistreatment from the behavior of Eri's mother and they visited to investigate several times. However, even though she was young, she knew that if she was separated from her mother here then at the same time she had to move to another place, in other words, she would be separated from Kouki, Eri who sensed that then acted a 'girl who loved her mother' with all her might.



She felt like she was going to vomit, but in front of the staffs she embraced her mother with a full smile and acted the scene of a close mother and daughter. Even now Eri still remembered the expression of her mother at that time. Her expression that changed from shock into a cramped face, and then it vividly changed into definite fear.



Looking at her mother like that, what Eri thought was, "Aah, so it's like that." Just by changing the method, something like position or emotion could be overturned easily. Just by her smiling cheerfully as though her gloominess until now was just a lie, her mother immediately averted her eyes and shut up. When later she whispered "Next, what do you want me to steal?" jokingly, her mother went pale and she screamed while rushing out from the home.



Eri was convinced, that all of these were thanks to Kouki――the prince who suddenly appeared and swore to protect her. That in that day her prince saved and changed her. That she was reborn due to Kouki. That was why, her life from now on would be together with him who was like a radiant light and she would live similarly within the light.



She indirectly threatened her mother, and then she induced so her mother only delivered the living cost to the home, she arranged the environment so she could be at Kouki's side…she was convinced that she was someone special that was chosen by the prince…



But, Eri was in a misunderstanding. For Kouki, Eri was nothing more than one person who should be saved by the hero of justice. After calling out to his classmates and asked them to be friendly to the isolated Eri, Kouki's rescue was over with that. Similar with how in anime the people that were saved by the hero didn't come out anymore at all in the next episode, for Kouki the matter of Eri was 'a story that was already over'.



That was why Eri thought strangely of Kouki who only came in contact with her as though she was the same like 'that other crowd', why the other girls were unable to understand that she was Kouki's 'special one' for some reason. 'Because, that spot is the spot where I belong right?' she wondered.



Due to that, Eri who was unable to approach Kouki in mind and body and could do nothing else except continuing to stare at Kouki began to notice various things.



The girls in the class who talked to her intimately did that only 'because that was Kouki's request'.



That at Kouki's side, there was already 'special one' who accompanied him from even far earlier than the time when they exchanged words at the bridge in the early morning, that there was no place for her to belong or anything there.



That For Kouki, she was a someone whose story with him was already over.



The moment she realized that, it was as though she was going mad, no, she was literally going mad while thinking about the same thing continuously every day.



――You said that I'm not alone anymore right?



――You said that you will protect me right?



――I am special for you right?



――Heey, why, are you saying the same words to another person I wonder?



――Heey, why, are you not looking at just me I wonder?



――Heey, why, right now, you are not rescuing me even though I'm in this much pain I wonder?



――Heey, why, are you showing that kind of face to another woman I wonder?



――Heey, why, are the eyes you are looking me with is the same like with 'that other crowd' I wonder?



――Heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, heey, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why, why……



Like that Eri understood.



About the human named Kouki.



And then Eri remembered.



What she learned from her mother, how the emotion and act of someone could be changed so easily just by one act.



That was why,



"Like this I was able to obtain Kouki-kun into my hand isn't it. Well, there were too many irregular things like another world summoning and so on though…"



"Hm? Eri, did you say something?"



In a certain place at the Holy Precincts, Eri who stared at a wasteland while whispering to herself caused Kouki to turn to her and he asked while tilting his head. To such Kouki, Eri smiled cheerfully while approaching him, and then she snuggled at his back. She was clinging coquettishly just like how once her mother did to that man. She did that unconsciously.



"Nope, it is nothing at all you knooow. I was just thinking that it will be great if we quickly defeat that demon, and then take back your childhood friends won't iiit, that's all you knooow"



"I see…. You're right. I also feel the same. We have to quickly release Shizuku, Kaori, and Ryutaro, also our classmates from the brainwashing. Nagumo too, he is unmistakably a classmate but…that guy has done too much evil. Even if I have to turn my heart into a demon, I have to defeat that guy. Even if I have to bear the stigma as a classmate killer, but I have to save everyone, isn't that right?"



"It's going to be okay you knooow, Kouki-kun. Because I'm right at your side seee? I will help you every time. It is me, only me, that will be Kouki's ally no matter what happened you knooow?"



"Eri…thank you. I can become strong like this, how I can fight that guy too, everything is thanks to Eri. Eri is my…"



"My? My what I wondeeer?"



Eri whispered into Kouki's ear and deliberately pressing him to speak out the obvious answer. Against that, Kouki's cheeks reddened slightly yet his words were firm.



"You are my…'special one'. No matter what happened, 'I won't let you be alone' from here on. 'I will protect Eri'."



"Fuh, fufu, kuh, fuufufu…"



"Eri? ――Nmu-"



Eri who leaked out a chuckle from being unable to endure it caused Kouki to look across his shoulder with a worried gaze at her. While showing an expression of ecstasy, Eri piled up her lips on Kouki's lips. And then, their lips separated with a silver string stretched between them. While staring back at Kouki's eyes that looked empty somehow, Eri murmured smilingly.



"Yes, it's fine like this. Kouki-kun, we are going to be together forever aren't weee"



Dry wind blew.



――in the world where there is nooo one other than the two of us



The last words whispered inside Eri's heart didn't enter Kouki's heart. In exchange of that, from a slightly distance place there was a sound echoing. Kouki's expression warped into an ugly look. His eyes contained flame of hatred.



It was the footsteps of the hated enemy, and his childhood friends.





Chapter 165




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. He also did the edits.



____________________________________________________



At the Ruined City



"It looks like a city at the end of the century right from the movie…"



"Yeah really. I've seen this kind of scene at Bio -zard or something…"



Suzu and Ryutaro whispered those kinds of things while making crunching sounds with their steps. They ran their gaze at the surrounding alertly, but bewilderment was running on their face.



"Wait, Ryutaro. Stop that already. What are you going to do if zombie really comes out here."



Shizuku replied with a repulsed face. And then, with her expression looked similarly bewildered, she ran her gaze at the surrounding. The scenery of a devastated city was spreading in the eyes of Shizuku and others.



When they came out from the rich colored space, they arrived at a modern city that looked nearly similar with earth with its maintained street and high-rise buildings crowding together. However, just like what Suzu and Ryutaro said, it was as though several hundred, or maybe even several thousand years had passed, everywhere they looked there were only decaying ruins.



There were buildings that looked like they could crumble anytime, there were also buildings that were barely standing by leaning on the neighboring building. All the spot that seemed to have glass attached had been smashed thoroughly, with the remains scattered everywhere. On the ground, there was rough and hard material like asphalt blanketing the ground, but there were countless cracks and undulations and also caved-in spots.



From how the faintly remaining words on the signboard scattered everywhere on the building wall or ground weren't earth letter, and how they couldn't find any traffic light at all on the street, furthermore from how the material of the building wasn't reinforced concrete, they could barely grasped that this wasn't a city of earth.



"Perhaps, in the past this city was crushed and then it was brought here whole. Something like taking a memento of what he crushed seemed like something that shitty bastard would do. There is also the trace of construction technique using magic that is completely impossible for the current earth applied here, it's like someone that thoroughly built a complicated card tower before smashing it."



"…There art a limit even for having a bad taste."



"This is the worst…"



Even on earth, there was a lot of romance stories about ancient cities that didn't remain in literature, cities that were excelling in technology even more advanced than the modern time or the like. Even this world might be a country that developed using magic in place of science until near the level of the modern earth.



And then, what was built up by those people was unmistakably trampled down by that Ehito Rujue while laughing. The figure of Ehito Rujue laughing loudly floated in their mind, turning their face into fierce loathing.



Although the city was devastated that it looked tragic just from looking, the townscape that looked similar to the modern city of earth made Hajime and others be somewhat nostalgic, they also felt that they were shown what would happen if Ehito was let free in the earth, causing them to tense their mind even further.



Before long, by the time they passed who knows how many intersections following the compass, a clock tower that looked just like London's Big Ben entered their sight from between the gaps of buildings. It appeared that clock tower was the entrance to go to the next area.



Hajime stored the compass in his breast pocket while taking the path that was heading toward the clock tower through a huge intersection.



But, right after that, his eyes quietly narrowed and his foot that was about to step forward returned back. Looking at his dangerous gaze, even the members other than Shia guessed that there was enemy and readied themselves. Only Shia seemed to be the one who had determined the location of the enemy, her gaze fixed for a moment on a part of the surrounding buildings before moving to another location continuously. There seemed to be something ahead of her gaze.



"Hajime-san. We are surrounded, what are we going to do?"
